









 
 
 



 



foia‎ > ‎ 

FBI-INFO 




Revised 06/05/15



This webpage will be devoted to explaining FBI abbreviations, acronyms, terminology, codes and standard forms used by the FBI.   It will be periodically updated to incorporate new information.




QUESTIONS/COMMENTS = ernie1241@aol.com 


FBI ABBREVIATIONS, ACRONYMS and TERMINOLOGY

This chart contains some of the more interesting and/or more common terms seen in FBI documents.  
   

TERM
 
Meaning
 

AAG
 
Assistant Attorney General
 

ADEX
 
Administrative Index (began 11/71) as successor to FBI Security Index and Reserve Index.  ADEX was discontinued in January 1976.
 

ADIC
 
Assistant Director in Charge
 

ADMINISTRATIVE PAGE
 
FBI reports usually contained data which was not to be shared outside the Bureau and that data was placed upon an “Administrative Page” that was detached when reports were sent to other agencies.  Typically, an Administrative Page contained the identity of T-sources and details regarding leads which should be pursued by specific field offices.   In some cases (particularly very lengthy serials), the information which normally appeared on Administrative Pages would, instead, be placed on “Cover Pages” at the beginning of Agent reports.
 

AEC
 
Atomic Energy Commission
 

AFB
 
Air Force Base
 

AFSA
 
Armed Forces Security Agency – the predecessor to National Security Agency
 

AG
 
Attorney General
 

AI
 
Agitator Index (began 8/4/67) as successor to Rabble Rouser Index.
 

AIRTEL

REURAIRTEL
 
An Airtel was an expedited form of communication between and among FBI offices and it was meant to apply to letters that should be typed and mailed on same day and usually sent by airmail.  Airtels were often classified and/or encrypted messages.  It originally was received as a teletype sent by airmail and, therefore, could be in teletype terminology.

 

“Reurairtel” was abbreviation for “regarding your airtel” referring to a previous communication sent to some office.
 

AL
 
Alien
 

ALEM PROGRAM
 
This program was initiated in August 1965 based upon information provided to the FBI by a KGB officer (stationed at the United Nations and serving as a Soviet diplomat) who became an FBI informant.  His FBI code name was “Fedora” and he is widely believed to be Yerbas Lichi aka Victor M. Lesovski or Lessiovski. 

The ALEM program apparently was designed to identify Soviet nationals through research into “INS cards” who “have entered the United States under assumed identities as (1) alien husbands of American wives or (2) male immigrants on first preference petitions due to professional and technical skills.”  According to one 1972 FBI document, about 2250 cases were opened under this program and it was supervised in the Special Case Unit of the Espionage Section by Special Agent G.M. Quinn.  [HQ 65-69532]
 

AMERICAN LEGION CONTACT PROGRAM
 
American Legion members were used by FBI as sources of information about security-related matters in their local communities.  This program began in November 1940 and ended in August 1954.
 

AMSD
 
Air Mail, Special Delivery
 

ARL
 
Anti-Riot Law Statutes
 

ASA
 
U.S. Army Security Agency
 

ASAC
 
Assistant Special Agent in Charge of a Field Office
 

ASCI
 
Assistant Chief of Staff For Intelligence (U.S. Army or U.S. Air Force)
 

ASN
 
Army Serial Number
 

ASSISTANT DIRECTOR
 
FBI employee in Charge of each Division at FBI HQ as well as the New York and Los Angeles field offices
 

ATTORNEY GENERAL PORTFOLIO
 
A secret plan which originated in 1948 which provided for the detention of U.S. citizens deemed to be threats to national security in times of national emergency.  The detention program became known as the AG Portfolio and involved suspension of the writ of habeas corpus and use of a Master Search Warrant.  Also see: Security Index Program
 

AUSA
 
Assistant United States Attorney
 

BAMM
 
Black Afro Militant Movement (Alfred Featherstone)
 

BANPOP PROGRAM
 
There is a cryptic description of this program in one heavily redacted FBI document.  Apparently, it had something to do with discovering “funding Soviet illegals” through access to bank records. The program was terminated on August 15, 1972. [HQ 65-70741]
 

BAPBOMB
 
FBI case re: 1963 bombing of Birmingham AL church that killed 4 black girls
 

BATF
 
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms
 

BEM
 
Business Executives Movement For Vietnam
 

BLACK BAG JOBS
 
FBI burglaries used to obtain subscription and membership lists, financial records, correspondence and photographs of documents on targeted individuals and organizations.  Also known as surreptitious entries.  In 1942, a special filing procedure was introduced for information obtained through break-ins.  Field offices requests for permission were captioned “Do Not File” so that such documentary evidence would not be serialized or indexed in the FBI’s Central Records System.  Instead, such files were kept in the office of the Assistant Director having supervisory responsibility and the files were to be destroyed every six months.  [HQ 66-8160]
 

BLIND MEMO
 
Memo written by FBI employees but not containing any markings that refer to the FBI as the source.
 

BM

BM-THREATS
 
Bombing Matter
 

BNPA
 
Black Nationalist Photographic Album.  This album was established in 1968 and contained photos and biographies of prominent black leaders who travelled extensively
 

BOCOV
 
Communist Coverage Along Mexican Border (initiated 1948; HQ 100-356015)
 

BOSS
 
Bureau of Special Services – New York Police Department aka Bureau of Special Services and Investigations
 

BPP

BPP-CF
 
Black Panther Party / Black Panther Party—Cleaver Faction
 

BRILAB
 
Bribery of Labor Officials – FBI undercover sting operation which began in 1979 and targeted organized crime and corrupt politicians.
 

BUFILE
 
FBI HQ main file
 

BUG
 
A listening device usually referred to as MISUR (microphone surveillance) or ELSUR (electronic surveillance)
 

BULET
 
Bureau letter
 

BULKY EXHIBITS
 
Material obtained during the course of an investigation which is too voluminous to be placed inside main file and, thus, was kept separately in a Bulky Exhibit Room and filed by case number.
 

BWP
 
Bureau War Plans
 

CANIL PROGRAM
 
There is a cryptic description of this program in one heavily redacted FBI document.  Apparently, it had something to do with “uncovering Soviet illegals”.  [HQ 65-70719]
 

CAP
 
Congress of African People’s
 

CAS
 
Chinese Activities Summary [HQ 105-229211]
 

CENTRAL RECORDS SYSTEM
 
Primary filing system used by FBI
 

CHANNELIZE
 
Copies of memos which are placed into specific pertinent files
 

CHICOIN
 
Counterintelligence Operations Against Chinese Communist Intelligence Activities in the U.S. (began 5/65 = HQ 105-135614)
 

CHICOM
 
Chinese Communists
 

CHIEF CLERK
 
FBI employee responsible for indexing documents and routing files to appropriate employee(s)
 

CI
 
Communist Index – was established in 1948 for individuals who did not meet Security Index requirements but were suspected of being Communist sympathizers.  In 1960 it was changed to Reserve Index.
 

CI
 
Criminal Informant or Confidential Informant
 

CIC
 
Counter-Intelligence Corps of U.S. Army
 

CINAL
 
Current Intelligence Analysis – CINAL information was disseminated to Executive Branch officials
 

CIRM
 
Communist Influence in Racial Matters
 

CNDI
 
Confidential National Defense Informant
 

COBICS
 
Communist Bloc Information Collation System
 

COI
 
Conflict of Interest
 

COINTELPRO
 
Counterintelligence Program.   The FBI’s COINTELPRO program was designed to disrupt and neutralize individuals and organizations thought to be a security problem for our country.
 

COINTELPRO-WHG
 
Counterintelligence Program: White Hate Groups (began 09/64 as effort to neutralize white extremist organizations, leaders, and their adherents. About 17 FBI field offices were involved. Program was discontinued 4/27/71.)  [HQ 157-9]
 

COKMA
 
Coverage of Known Meet Areas (i.e. Surveillance of Soviet Agents/Sources) [HQ 65-73750]
 

COMINFIL
 
Communist Infiltration Of
 

COMINT
 
Communications Intelligence (NSA reports)
 

COMPIC
 
Communist Infiltration of Motion Picture Industry (HQ 100-138754)
 

COMPROS
 
Communist Prosecutions (aka Smith Act Trials)
 

COMSAB
 
Potential Communist Saboteurs (FBI program used to identify Security Index individuals who were thought to have potential for sabotage because of their training or their connection to key strategic industries and installations.)
 





CONF INFT
 
Confidential Informant.  The FBI uses various descriptive phrases to describe or evaluate their informants.  Among the most common:

·         Has furnished reliable information in the past

·         Of unknown reliability

·         Of known unreliability

·         Of known reliability

·         Has supplied insufficient information to determine reliability

In addition, a percentage of reliability could be used to describe informant.
 

CONFIDENTIAL
 
Document containing information related to national defense – provided by sources whose identities should not be revealed
 

CONFIDENTIAL SOURCE
 
Individuals who furnish the FBI information available to them through their employment or their position in the community. The FBI Manual of Instruction, circa 1975 cites as examples of confidential sources "bankers, telephone company employees, and landlords."

Confidential Source was established as a category in March 1950.  The FBI Manual of Instructions (Section 107-T) provides instructions to field offices regarding procedures to follow.   FBI HQ authorization was required to initiate contact with a CS involved with Communist or related investigations.  In these instances, field offices were required to submit detailed background information to HQ regarding the source's date and place of birth, citizenship status. residence, employment, credit and criminal record and military service record (if any).  In addition, a brief history of source's affiliation with CPUSA or other organizations and results of interview with him/her.   Bureau clearance was not required for CS contacted in connection with criminal matters.
 

CONTROL FILE
 
A control file is usually created only for the most important FBI cases and it contains instructions sent to field offices along with results of investigations.  Statistical information is often included in a Control File.
 

COORNAP
 
Adolph Coors Kidnapping Case [HQ 7-9575]
 

CORRELATION SUMMARY
 
A correlation summary was usually limited to large case files.  The summary lists all file and serial numbers along with a brief synopsis of their content which contain important information about a particular person.
 

COSMIC
 
NATO classification for highly secret documents.  Used over and above “Top Secret”.  HQ 62-9871
 

COVER PAGE
 
Summary memoranda or reports usually begin with page(s) which have administrative data, leads which should be pursued by specified field offices, and perhaps informant evaluations but the cover pages were not sent outside the Bureau.  Usually the cover page(s) were designated with alphabetic letters, “A” “B” etc.
 

CRD
 
Civil Rights Division – U.S Department of Justice
 

CROSS REFERENCE

aka see refs
 
A cross reference is a mention of a subject in a file on another individual, organization, event, activity, etc.
 

C-TE
 
Criminal Top Echelon Informants
 

CUSTODIAL DETENTION
 
Program which was initiated as result of directive of President Roosevelt in September 1939 to list individuals whom should be considered for apprehension and detention in event of national emergency. It subsequently became known as Security Index.  (HQ 100-358086)
 

CP or CPUSA
 
Communist Party USA
 

CR
 
Civil Rights
 

CRA-64
 
Civil Rights Act of 1964
 

CS
 
Confidential Source (usually given a source number)
 

DA / PDA
 
Double Agent / Potential Double Agent
 

DABURN
 
FBI code name for file pertaining to January 11, 1966 murder of Vernon F. Dahmer Sr. of Forrest County MS by several Klan members. Thirteen men, who were connected with the Ku Klux Klan, were eventually brought to trial in the late 1960s on charges that ranged from conspiracy to intimidate, to arson and murder. At that time, however, only four of the men were convicted and one entered a guilty plea. 


 In the late 1990s three men, Samuel H. Bowers Jr., Charles Noble, and Deavours Nix, were arrested again in connection with the Dahmer murder. Sam Bowers, the Imperial Wizard of the Ku Klux Klan, had previously been tried four times for the crimes committed on the Dahmer family, however each trial ended in a mistrial. Although Bowers was not present at the attack on the Dahmer home in 1966, he was accused of having ordered the attack to take place. In August of 1998, Bowers was tried for the fifth time in connection with the Dahmer murder, and this time he was convicted of murder and arson and received a sentence of life in prison.  Charles Noble was tried in connection with the Dahmer murder in 1999, however his trial ended in a mistrial. Deavours Nix died before his trial took place
 

DCI
 
Director, Central Intelligence Agency
 

DCII
 
Defense Central Index of Investigations
 

DEAD FILE
 
File created by field office when no immediate investigation is warranted but they anticipate opening case file in the near future
 

DECLASSIFY
 
Procedure to remove security classification (confidential, secret, or top secret)  from documents or files 
 

DEPAMD
 
Deception Program For Anti-Missile Defense [HQ 65-66140]
 

DESECO
 
Development of Selected Contacts Against Soviet-Bloc Officials (initiated 12/57, HQ 105-71688). FBI interviewed Americans who returned from Soviet Bloc countries.
 

DETCOM
 
Detention of Communists -- Program to detain known or suspected Communist Party members in time of national emergency. [HQ 100-356062]
 

DID
 
FBI Domestic Intelligence Division (formerly Security Division)
 

DIO
 
District Intelligence Office (Office of Naval Intelligence)
 

DIP
 
Defectors-In-Place
 

DIVISION 5
 
FBI Domestic Intelligence Division (formerly Security Division or National Defense Division)
 

DO NOT FILE
 
Procedure designed to keep sensitive documents out of the Bureau’s normal Central Records System
 

DOUBLE ZERO FILES
 
00 Files are FBI Control Files – which concern policy and procedure
 

DPOB
 
Date and Place of Birth
 

EASTCON
 
East Coast Conspiracy To Save Lives
 

EBF
 
Enclosure Behind File – i.e. usually copies of publications which, due to space considerations, FBI HQ did not want to incorporate into the main file but would be filed separately “behind” the main file
 

EDP
 
Emergency Detention Program (also see: DETCOM).  The EDP was based upon Title II of the Internal Security Act of 1950. [HQ 100-398030]
 

EGIS
 
East German Intelligence Service
 

ELSUR
 
Electronic Surveillance Index – was a card file of subjects mentioned in electronic surveillances
 

EM
 
Extremist Matter
 

ENC or ENCL
 
Enclosure – such as a publication which was enclosed with a letter sent to the Bureau.  As a result, the serial number might reflect this:  HQ 100-1234, #8, enclosure – which means that serial #8 has an enclosure.
 

EO
 
Presidential Executive Order
 

EOD
 
Entered on Duty (date)
 

EPA
 
Extremist Photograph Album
 

ESP
 
Espionage
 

ESTABLISHED SOURCE
 
Any source with whom the FBI developed a relationship over time and who was trusted to keep relationship confidential.  Usually a Confidential Source rather than a paid informant.
 

EX or EX-CS
 
Extremist / Extremist Confidential Source
 

EXP PROC
 
Expedite Processing
 

EXTREMIST ACTIVITIES
 
Activities whose objective is overthrowing, destroying or undermining the U.S. Government by illegal means OR denying Constitutional rights to American citizens.  The FBI used “Extremist” to describe ethnic radicals, members of white hate groups, and black or native American radicals.  The FBI unit which covered these matters was originally called Racial Intelligence Section but changed to Extremist Section in September 1967.
 

FAG
 
Fraud Against The Government
 

FBI 

IDENTIFICATION NUMBER
 
Usually associated with FBI “rap sheet” which lists arrests made by law enforcement agencies and ultimate disposition of cases.
 

FBW
 
Fraud By Wire
 

FEDORA
 
FBI Code Name for KGB Official Working at United Nations Who Was FBI Informant [HQ 105-104811]
 

FCI
 
Foreign Counterintelligence
 

FGE
 
Foreign Government Employee
 

FGJ
 
Federal Grand Jury
 

FINAL
 
Foreign Intelligence Analysis
 

FISUR
 
Physical Surveillance
 

FLD
 
Foreign Liaison Desk
 

FNU
 
First Name Unknown
 

FPC
 
Fingerprint Classification
 

FPC
 
Foreign Police Cooperation Program
 

FUDE
 
Fugitive / Deserter
 

G-2
 
Army Intelligence (Office of Assistant Chief of Staff)
 

GHETTO INFORMANT PROGRAM
 
Initiated June 1967 to monitor black radicals
 

GID
 
General Investigative Division / General Intelligence Division
 

GRU
 
Soviet Military Intelligence
 

GUS SURVEY
 
Program whereby FBI field offices examined mail in certain locations in attempt to locate mail intended for Soviet illegal agents.  [HQ 65-67003]
 

HEARNAP
 
Kidnapping of Patricia Hearst [HQ 7-15200]
 

HILEV
 
High Level (term usually used in connection with intelligence information such as HILEV items or data received from some source)
 

HSCA
 
House Select Committee on Assassinations [HQ 62-117290]
 

HCUA or HUAC
 
House Committee on Un-American Activities – succeeded by House Internal Security Committee
 

I
 
On FBI Search Slips – means “identical”, i.e. the file reference is about the person or organization which has been searched.  “NI” meant “not identical”, i.e. reference is to another person of same name.
 

IAC
 
Intelligence Advisory Committee [HQ 62-90718]
 

ICIS
 
Interdepartmental Committee on Internal Security
 

IDENTIFICATION DIVISION
 
FBI HQ Division which has control of fingerprints, wanted notices, and missing persons notices
 

IEC
 
Intelligence Evaluation Committee
 

IIC
 
Interdepartmental Intelligence Conference
 

IICC
 
Interagency Intelligence Coordinating Committee
 

INLET
 
Intelligence Letter through which FBI regularly furnished the President and Attorney General “high level intelligence data in the internal security field…on a continuous basis” starting in November 1969. The type of information provided included status of internal security cases, intelligence trends, foreign intelligence, inside information regarding demonstrations or civil unrest of more than local significance and “items with an unusual twist or concerning prominent personalities which may be of special interest to the President or Attorney General.”
 

INTC
 
U.S. Army Intelligence Corps
 

IOB
 
International Operations Branch
 

ISA 1950
 
Internal Security Act of 1950
 

IS-C

IS-SWP

SM-C

ANP-RM
 
FBI memos often contain abbreviations to indicate the nature of the matter being discussed.  In the examples at left the explanations are as follows:

IS-C = Internal Security-Communist

IS-SWP = Internal Security–Socialist Workers Party

SM-C = Security Matter, Communist

ANP-RM = American Nazi Party--Racial Matter
 

ISD
 
Internal Security Division, U.S. Department of Justice
 

ISL
 
Independent Socialist League
 

ITSP
 
Interstate Transportation of Stolen Property
 

JUNE MAIL
 
Separate filing method used by FBI starting in June 1949 to keep certain info confidential and not serialized in a Special Files Room – particularly information which the FBI obtained through wiretaps, black bag jobs, or extremely sensitive sources.
 

KBE
 
Key Black Extremist
 

KF
 
Key Figures
 

KFL
 
Key Facilities List
 

KGB
 
Soviet Committee For State Security
 

KHRUSVIS
 
Soviet Premier Nikita Khrushchev Visit to U.S. 1960 [HQ 62-104045]
 

LCN
 
La Cosa Nostra
 

LEGAT
 
Legal Attache offices – i.e. FBI offices operating in foreign countries (Beirut, Bern, Bogota, Bonn, Caracas, Copenhagen, Hong Kong, La Paz, London, Madrid, Managua, Manila, Mexico City, Ottawa, Panama, Paris, Rome, Tel Aviv, Tokyo)
 

LHM
 
Letterhead Memorandum – FBI summary intended for other agencies but which conceals confidential sources.
 

LIAISON PROGRAM
 
Every FBI Field office kept lists of people whom were to be contacted on regular schedule for “good will” purposes and to obtain information from them.  Included airlines, banks, defense contractors, hotels, trucking companies, federal agencies, police departments, news media, etc.
 

LIAISON SOURCE
 
Officer or leader of legitimate civil rights organization who provided FBI with advance information concerning activities of his organization (as of March 1970, there were 1975 liaison sources)
 

LMRA-1947
 
Labor-Management Relations Act of 1947
 

LNU
 
Last Name Unknown
 

MAIL COVER
 
Procedure by which the Post Office recorded names and addresses of sender and recipient of letters
 

MAIN FILE

SUB-A FILE

SUB-B FILE

 
 
A “main file” usually contains all the memos and investigative reports about people or organizations to which the FBI gives specific sequential serial numbers and they are indexed in the FBI’s General Index aka Central Records System. 

The “sub files” designated “A” or “B” usually contain material which is similar to EBF’s, i.e. copies of publications authored or disseminated by individuals or organizations (such as their newsletters, pamphlets, press releases, etc). plus newspaper/magazine articles about the individual or organization. Most sub-files are designated “1A” and each individual item may be given a number such as “1A-1” then “1A-2” etc.  Some of the largest files also contain sub-B files and those follow the same pattern for each new item added, i.e. 1B-1, 1B-2, etc.

Note #1:  If an FOIA requester wants everything that the FBI has about a particular subject, the request should specify “main files” and “sub-files” OR “main files” and “sub-A” and “sub-B” files.  Often, the FBI will not process sub-files unless specifically asked.

Note #2:  There is another type of “sub-file” such as when, after the FBI HQ created a main file on a particular subject, it then also created additional files on the same subject but broken down into sub-files to capture information provided by specific persons or about specific geographical locations or other categories.  For example, a HQ main file on informants might be designated as HQ 66-45, but reports that came from one specific informant might be placed in 66-45, sub-264. 

Another possibility is when files were created on a specific organization or subject (such as the Communist Party or the Citizens Council Movement or United Klans of America or the FBI's COINTELPRO programs) and then sub-files were created for pertinent information about specific cities, counties, states, or neighborhoods.  

For example:  the HQ main file on the Citizens Council movement is HQ 105-34237.  The HQ file on the Citizens Councils in Atlanta was HQ 105-34237-2 and for Knoxville was HQ 105-34237-24.   

The HQ main file on COINTELPRO-White Hate Groups is 157-9 but there are HQ sub-files for specific cities such as:  HQ 157-9-4 (Birmingham AL), and 157-9-9 (Chicago IL).
 

MDC
 
May Day Collective
 

MEDBURG
 
Burglary of Media PA FBI office in 1971
 

MEMORANDUM
 
Typically, a communication from FBI to other Justice Department officials such as Attorney General or from one FBI employee to another FBI employee
 

MIBURN
 
Mississippi Burning – 1964 Murders of Civil Rights Workers (Schwerner, Goodman, Cheney)
 

MID
 
Military Intelligence Division
 

MIDEM
 
FBI coverage of 1972 Democratic Convention demonstrators (Miami FL)
 

MIG
 
Military Intelligence Group (US Army)
 

MIPORN
 
Miami FL Pornography Case – Undercover operation into porn industry and film piracy
 

MISUR
 
Microphone Surveillance (often from illegal break-in or burglary)
 

MOCASE
 
Morros Case or Moscow Case – Soviet espionage network in U.S. during 1940’s involving FBI double agent Boris Morros. [HQ 100-352385]
 

MURKIN
 
Murder of Martin Luther King Jr. [HQ 44-38861, Memphis 44-1987, Atlanta 44-2386]
 

MYLETS
 
My Letters Dated…
 

NA
 
Naturalized Citizen
 

NAME CHECK
 
Requests from other agencies for loyalty information on its current or prospective employees
 

NAS
 
Naval Air Station [usually a reference to FBI reports sent to local Office of Naval Intelligence]
 

NB
 
Native Born
 

NCIC
 
National Crime Information Center
 

NEWKILL
 
FBI case pertaining to May 1971 murder of two New York City policemen
 

NI
 
Not identical
 

NIS or NISO
 
Naval Investigative Service Office (successor to ONI)
 

NMI
 
No Middle Initial
 

NMN
 
No Middle Name
 

NO CONTACT LIST
 
Critics of FBI or of FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover Whom Were Not To Be Contacted
 

NO SEGEGRABLE INFO
 
When the FBI decides to apply a literal interpretation of the subject of an FOIA request, it may not release entire pages or sections of a serial by claiming there is “no segregable material” or information.  For example:  if an FOIA request is made on Joe Smith and the FBI discovers a 50-page serial that includes references to Joe Smith on 11 pages, the FBI can choose to deny the other pages or heavily redact them claiming “no segregable material”.
 

NOI
 
Nation of Islam
 

NPAC
 
National Peace Action Coalition
 

NPR
 
Nationalist Party of Puerto Rico
 

NSA
 
National Security Agency
 

NSD
 
FBI National Security Division
 

NSWPP
 
National Socialist White People’s Party (successor to American Nazi Party)
 

O&C
 
 “Official and Confidential Files” were highly sensitive files which were kept in the office of FBI Director Hoover and Assistant Director Louis B. Nichols (over 250 folders)

See: http://www.marquette.edu/library/archives/Mss/FBI/FBI-series16.shtml 
 

OASCI
 
Office of Assistant Chief of Staff For Intelligence (US Army)
 

OFFICE CONTACTS
 
Usually business people or others who could be relied upon to provide information.  Each field office had a contact program whereby they would establish liaison with local groups and enterprises in their community. These were mostly goodwill efforts, but did provide venues for the Bureau to talk about issues that might affect the group or its members, and to solicit their help in the form of confidential sources or panel sources.
 

ONI
 
Office of Naval Intelligence
 

OO
 
Office of Origin – i.e. the FBI office which opened the investigation and is primarily responsible for the case.  For example, New York City is the OO for the Communist Party USA so FBI files reflect “OO:NYC”
 

OPERATION SHAMROCK
 
Program under which the NSA received copies of most international telegrams leaving the U.S. from RCA, ITT, and Western Union. At one point, it was proposed that the FBI assume responsibility for this program.
 

OSI
 
Air Force Intelligence (Office of Special Investigations)
 

P&C
 
Personal and Confidential
 

PANEL SOURCE
 
Panel sources are defined as individuals who are not involved in an investigated group but who "will attend its public gatherings on behalf of FBI for intelligence purposes or as potential witnesses." Panel sources were first developed to meet the need for witnesses in the course of Smith Act trials of Communist Party members in the 1950s. In those trials, it was necessary to prove simple facts as to the existence of the Communist Party, the dates and places of public meetings held by the Party, and similar matters. To avoid surfacing and exposing regular FBI informants within the Party to establish such facts, panel sources were developed. 
 

PCI
 
Potential Criminal Informant
 

PCPJ
 
People’s Coalition For Peace and Justice
 

PLAIN TEXT
 
Information Written Without Using Code
 

PLANT INFORMANT
 
Created in September 1940 to develop FBI sources of information in defense plants.  By September 1942 there were 23,746 Plant Informants in 3879 plants.  Program ended in March 1969.
 

PLP
 
Progressive Labor Party
 

PPA
 
Proletarian Party of America
 

PRELIMINARY INQUIRY
 
Preliminary inquiries were conducted by FBI to obtain information about a person or organization by using mostly public sources (such as media coverage, library resources such as Who’s Who directories) along with FBI informants and established sources in order to determine if a formal investigation was warranted because of suspected criminal or subversive activities or any potential violations of federal laws.  A preliminary inquiry often lasted only 1-3 months.
 

PRETEXT CALL
 
A pretext is an investigative technique used to obtain background and identifying information or photographs of an individual without identifying the FBI as the interested party. An example would be an Agent who makes a phone call to verify someone’s home address, where he/she can be reached, their employment, or their current location etc.  Sometimes calls are made just to record the voice of a suspect or to obtain literature regarding a new organization.  Pretexts can also be used to gain access to a property.  The FBI published a 35-page monograph in May 1956 entitled “Pretexts and Cover Techniques” which was used for Agent training purposes.
 

PRO
 
Prominent Person
 

PROSAB
 
Protection Against Sabotage of Strategic Air Command Bases
 

PROSECUTIVE SUMMARY
 
FBI field office report which summarizes evidence and availability of witnesses in a case under investigation.
 

PSI or PCI
 
Potential Security Informant / Potential Confidential Informant (persons designated as potential informants were not yet established as reliable information sources and that process might take a year for the FBI to make a conclusion with respect to their reliability.)
 

RA
 
Registration Act aka Foreign Agents Registration Act  of 1938 (usually pertains to cases of individuals who may not have completed required forms to register with U.S. Justice Dept because of their activities on behalf of a foreign government – such as seeking to influence legislation pending before Congress or providing public relations services for a foreign government.)
 

RA
 
Resident Agency (small satellite office of main FBI field office)
 

RABBLE ROUSER INDEX
 
Created in August 1967 (abolished April 1971) to identify individuals with propensity for inciting violence (later known as Agitator Index).  It was initially described as an Index designed to capture background information on individuals "who have demonstrated by their actions and speeches that they have a propensity for fomenting racial disorder."  {SAC Letter 67-47).

A subsequent SAC Letter (67-70) stated:

"A rabble rouser is defined as a person who tries to arouse people to violent action by appealing to their emotions, prejudices, etc., a demagogue. You will note that under prior criteria the Rabble Rouser Index served as an index only for individuals of national prominence with particular consideration given to those who travel extensively and was limited to those fomenting racial disorder.  It is the intent of this expanded criteria to have within each division as well as nationwide an index of agitators of all types whose activities have a bearing on the national security.  This would include, for example, black nationalists, white supremacists, Puerto Rican nationalists, anti-Vietnam demonstration leaders, and other extremists." 
 

RACON
 
Racial Conditions
 

REBULET
 
Referring to previous Bureau Letter (with date)
 

REBUTEL
 
Referring to previous teletype from Bureau (with date)
 

REMYLET
 
Referring to My Letter (with date)
 

REPORT
 
Written document prepared by field office containing the results of its investigation.
 

REREP
 
Referring to Report By
 

RESERVE INDEX
 
Created in June 1960 and abolished September 1971.  One FBI memo describes Reserve Index as “comprised of individuals with subversive backgrounds not meeting the Security Index criteria but who in a time of national emergency are in a position to influence others against the national interest.  The RI is broken down into two sections, A and B, with A containing the names of those individuals who in time of national emergency are in a position to influence others against the national interest or are likely to furnish material financial aid to subversive elements due to their subversive associates and ideology."

Section A consisted of teachers, journalists, lawyers and other professionals.  Section B contained all other Reserve Index subjects.  Martin Luther King Jr. and Norman Mailer were on Reserve Index.
 

REURAIRTEL
 
Referring to Your Airtel
 

REUREP
 
Referring to Your Report
 

REURLET
 
Referring to Your Letter
 

REURTEL
 
Referring to Your Teletype or Telegram
 

RFMT
 
Radio Frequency Microphone Telephone Device
 

RI
 
Racial Informant
 

RM
 
Racial Matter
 

RNA
 
Republic of New Africa (Milton and Richard Henry)
 

RUC
 
Referred Upon Completion To Office of Origin – i.e. one field office has completed whatever it was asked to do and it is referring the matter back to the original office for any further action
 

RYM
 
Revolutionary Youth Movement
 

SA
 
FBI Special Agent
 

SAC
 
FBI Special Agent in Charge of a Field Office
 

SAC LETTER
 
Instructions to FBI field offices from HQ
 

SACB
 
Subversive Activities Control Board
 

SATPIA
 
Satellite Personnel Intelligence Assets
 

SBIS
 
Soviet Bloc Intelligence Services
 

SDS
 
Students For A Democratic Society
 

SEARCH SLIP
 
Lists file numbers and serials containing references to subject of search.  Could be limited to only “subversive” or “criminal” or “non-subversive” references.
 

SECTION
 
FBI files are organized into sections which usually contain about 200 pages of documents.
 

SECURITY FLASH
 
Procedure whereby field office asks HQ Identification Division if fingerprints of a Security Index subject have been received.
 

SECURITY INDEX

SECURITY INFORMANT
 
INDEX: List of persons who were subject to apprehension and detention during time of national emergency.  Previously called Custodial Detention List. At highest point, there were 26,000 names on the Security Index.

SECURITY INFORMANT:  See section 107G of FBI Manual of Instructions regarding procedures used by field offices with respect to handling their Security Informants.  HQ required field office Agents to contact their Security Informants every 2 weeks to obtain whatever information they had. Agents were required to prepare memo for their SAC to set forth "any personal weaknesses, domestic difficulties, indications of untrustworthiness or unreliability or other similar problems presented by the informant and the steps being taken by the Agent to prevent any such situations later becoming a source of embarrassment to the Bureau." [SAC Letter 55-13]

In 1960, the FBI had 433 live Security Informants inside the Communist Party.

For additional information see:

https://sites.google.com/site/ernie124102/cpusa/informants
 

SEE REF
 
Refers to index references to a subject which appear in files other than those created on that specific individual or organization.  Also known as xrefs or cross-references.  Typically, the FBI will not process “see refs” or cross-references when FOIA requests are made.  Instead, they only process “main files”.
 

SERIAL
 
Specific FBI document within a file.  Usually, serials are in chronological order.  Most serials are assigned specific numbers but there are also “unrecorded serials” which are not assigned a serial number but they usually appear in date sequence within a file.
 

SERIALIZE
 
To assign a specific serial number to a document in a file.
 

SGE
 
Security of Government Employees
 

SI
 
Security Informant
 

SI
 
Security Index Program [Began 06/40 as program to develop lists of individuals considered for detention in the event of a threat to the national security.  Individuals were added to SI based upon their membership and activity and/or association with subversive organizations considered dangerous or potentially dangerous to the internal security of the nation.  The Program required collection of sufficient information to justify apprehension and detention to minimize potential for espionage, sabotage, or subversion.  In its later years, the Index was broken down into three Priority groupings in accordance with the relative degree of dangerousness.  Priority I and II consisted of individuals in actual or potential leadership; Priority III was comprised of rank-and-file subjects. ]
 

SIO
 
Special Investigations Office
 

SIS
 
Special Intelligence Service (created during World War II for intelligence gathering primarily in Western Hemisphere countries.  Abolished in 1946.)
 

SM
 
Security Matter
 

SMC
 
Student Mobilization Committee To End The War In Vietnam
 

SODAC
 
Soviet Diplomatic Activities [HQ 65-30092]
 

SOG
 
Seat Of Government aka FBI HQ
 

SOI
 
Sources of Information
 

SOLO
 
Counterintelligence operation which developed high quality information about CPUSA, the Soviet Union and its satellites, and the world Communist movement largely based upon reports made by two high-level moles inside the CPUSA – Morris and Jack Childs – whose symbol numbers were CG-5184-S* and NY-694-S* respectively.
 

SOURCE
 
Source provides raw information on ad hoc basis but had no ongoing relationship with the FBI. Typically, a source could be a landlord or neighbor or employee of financial institution, employers, airline and hotel employees etc who provide information without a subpoena.  Also could be non-human (technical device).
 

SOVME
 
Soviet Messages Furnished To FBI By Bureau Sources [HQ 65-58068]
 

SPECTAR
 
Special Targets For Informant Development
 

SPECIAL CORRESPONDENTS LIST
 
Persons considered friendly toward Bureau interests who received Bureau publications and expedited replies to their inquiries.  Included politicians, news media employees, prominent business people, retired Special Agents, etc.
 

SPECIAL INQUIRY SECTION
 
FBI HQ unit that processed “name checks” for the White House
 

SPIA
 
Soviet Personnel Intelligence Assets
 

STOP NOTICE
 
FBI notice to an agency (such as Police Department or Immigration Service) to alert FBI if they had contact with specified individual.
 

SUB-FILE
 
A sub-section of a main file.  
 

SULET
 
Submit Letter
 

SUREP
 
Submit Report
 

SYMBOL NUMBER
 
Code used to disguise identity of FBI informants who provided “valuable and sensitive information on a regular basis.”  FBI Agents used symbol numbers in their investigative reports and memos without identifying the informant’s name.    Most symbol numbers consisted of three parts: 

(1) the 2-or-3 character prefix which identified the FBI field office to which the informant reported such as CG for Chicago or DL for Dallas or TP for Tampa or WFO for Washington field office.

(2) the specific number assigned to an informant and 

(3) the suffix which identified the type of informant – such as “C” for criminal and “S” for security and “R” for racial informant.

In addition, an asterisk added to a symbol number indicated that the informant should never be identified and was not available for court testimony.  One of the most important FBI informants was Morris Childs and his symbol number was CG-5824-S* which indicates that he was a Chicago security informant who should never be identified nor testify in court proceedings.
 

T-NUMBER
 
Temporary symbol number assigned to confidential information source mentioned in FBI report – such as T-1 or T-2.  A temporary symbol number applies only to the document in which it appears which means that the same confidential source could be assigned T-1 in one document and then be identified as T-7 in another document.  The specific identity of each T-source usually was provided on an Administrative Page attached to every FBI report.

Note:  A “T-number” can be assigned to a technique such as mail cover, trash cover, wiretap, or physical surveillance or even a burglary.  Illegal techniques were sometimes identified as “anonymous source” and then assigned a T-number.

In March 1955, FBI Director Hoover sent a memo to the Attorney General which made the following observations:

"In many instances, a source concealed by a temporary informant symbol is not a live informant, but, instead, is a technical surveillance, a microphone surveillance, a trash cover, mail cover, or other investigative technique...In an estimated 55% of the Security of Government Employee cases, the reports contain inanimate sources of this type whose identities are concealed by temporary informant symbols.  Other temporary informant symbols would pertain to such sources as live informants and neighbors or professional men who specifically requested their identities not be disclosed." [HQ 66-2542-3, serial #928, page 2; 3/1/55 Hoover memo to AG]
 

TELETYPE
 
Message transmitted by machine
 

TEPCI
 
Top Echelon Potential Criminal Informant
 

TESUR
 
Technical Surveillance (i.e. telephone wiretaps and microphone surveillance)
 

TF
 
Top Functionary
 

TGP
 
Theft of Government Property
 

THUMBNAIL SKETCH PROGRAM
 
Program initiated on 10/27/53 to insure that FBI field offices used current and uniform characterizations of subversive organizations in their reports.  About 425 organizations were summarized in Thumbnail Sketches.
 

TOPHAT
 
FBI code name for Lt. Gen. Dmitri Fedorovich Polyakov – a Soviet military intelligence official who was a double agent for the FBI for two decades. [HQ 105-18153]
 

TOPLEV
 
Top Level Intelligence (referring to key figures in criminal or subversive organizations)
 

TRASH COVER
 
FBI search for information by going through garbage
 

TROPUS
 
Travel of the President of the U.S.
 

TRUE COPY
 
FBI-typed copy of incoming handwritten letter
 

UACB
 
Unless Advised To The Contrary By Bureau
 

UCR
 
Uniform Crime Reports
 

UFAP
 
Unlawful Flight To Avoid Prosecution
 

UKA
 
United Klans of America, Inc. (led by Robert M. Shelton)
 

UN
 
Unknown
 

UNE
 
United Nations Employee
 

UNIRAC
 
Union Racketeering
 

UNRECORDED
 
A document in FBI file which was not given a serial number
 

UNSUB or UNSUBS
 
Unknown subject or subjects – i.e. the specific person(s) responsible for some criminal activity are not currently known 
 

UPRF
 
Unlawful Possession or Receipt of Firearms
 

USA
 
United States Attorney
 

USCIB
 
United States Communication Intelligence Board (pertains to decoding diplomatic intercepts)
 

USEB
 
United States Evaluation Board
 

UTL
 
Unable To Locate
 

VAUGHN INDEX
 
Court Ordered Listing Which Itemizes Every Document Withheld From FOIA Requester and Includes Justification For Each Claimed Exemption
 

VB
 
Venceremos Brigade
 

VEGMDN
 
FBI Case Re: Las Vegas Money Skimming
 

VIDEM
 
Vietnam Demonstrations
 

VRA-65
 
Voting Rights Act of 1965
 

VVAW
 
Vietnam Veterans Against The War
 

WAS
 
With Aliases – i.e. person is known to use different names
 

WFO
 
Washington field office of FBI
 

WKKKKOM
 
White Knights of the Ku Klux Klan of Mississippi (Samuel H. Bowers = Imperial Wizard)
 

WRL
 
War Resisters League
 

WSA
 
Worker Student Alliance
 

YIP
 
Youth International Party
 

YSA
 
Young Socialist Alliance
 





Section V = FBI STANDARD FORMS 


I don’t think anyone has ever compiled a comprehensive list of all standard forms used by the FBI – but I summarize below some of the ones I have come across:


FORM #
 
Subject Matter or Use
 

CC-320
 
Vocation Record [used to identify “specialized Bureau training and experience” including the specific training “schools” which Agents attended and specialized skills they had.]
 

DO-5
 
Director Office Record of Telephone Call or Visitor
 

DO-7
 
FBI Director Office Route Slip
 

FD-4
 
Field Office Internal Route Slip
 

FD-5
 
Serial Chargeout (document removed from one file and placed into another file)
 

FD-9
 
Request for FBI Identification Division to Furnish Criminal Record to Field Office
 

FD-36
 
Transmittal Instructions From Field Office [Instructions For Communications by Teletype or Airtel] in Plain Text or Code
 

FD-65
 
Fugitive Information
 

FD-71
 
Complaint Form (Public Contacts With FBI Field Offices – by phone, mail, or in-person)
 

FD-72
 
Report Form (For Field Office Report to HQ on Individual or Organization)
 

FD-73
 
Automobile Record Form
 

FD-115
 
Request to Post Office to Commence Mail Cover
 

FD-122
 
Field Office Recommendation For New Security Index or Reserve Index Card And Changes To Existing Cards

[SI Card identified person’s name, race, sex, date and place of birth, their residence and business addresses, whether native-born, naturalized, or alien and if they worked at a “Key Facility” that location was entered.  The security categories were: Communist, Socialist Workers Party, Independent Socialist League or Other (to be specified).  A “Tab For Detcom” option was included for apprehension and detention in time of national emergency.]
 

FD-128
 
Field Office Correction to Security Index Card
 

FD-142
 
Recommendation For Installation of Technical or Microphone Surveillance
 

FD-143
 
Justification For Continuation of Technical or Microphone Surveillance
 

FD-153
 
Interview Log
 

FD-154
 
Verification of Information on Security Index Card
 

FD-159
 
Record of Information Furnished Other Agencies
 

FD-160
 
Indices Search Slip – This form was sent to the Chief Clerk to request search of FBI indexes for criminal and/or subversive references on individuals or organizations or publications. A requester could ask to see a list of “all references” in FBI files or the search parameters could be limited to only “subversive references” or “criminal references” or specific case files (criminal or subversive).  The requester could also limit the search to specific years.
 

FD-165
 
Request That Security Flash Be Placed in Files Of Identification Division
 

FD-169
 
FBI File Information Furnished Orally to Another Agency
 

FD-186
 
Special Agent Personal Observation of Security Index Subject
 

FD-192
 
Inventory of Property Acquired As Evidence
 

FD-204
 
Cover Sheet to LHM [Usually contains “Synopsis” of information in the memo along with distribution of copies to other agencies (such as to Army Intelligence (G-2 or INTC=U.S. Army Intelligence Corps), Naval Intelligence (ONI, NISO, or NCIS), Air Force Intelligence (OSI),  U.S. Secret Service, INS, BATF, or other agencies.  The cover sheet normally reflects both the HQ and field office file numbers and name of Agent who prepared the report and the type of case being discussed.]
 

FD-205
 
Field Office Status Report [Form used by field office to tell HQ that deadline for submitting a report or for completing a case cannot be met and why.]
 

FD-209
 
Contacts With Security, Criminal, Racial Informants [Used to record contacts with informants and identify applicable file numbers and title/subject of case which information provided refers to]
 

FD-214
 
Suggested Bureau Indexing
 

FD-216
 
Summary of Information Received From Source
 

FD-221
 
Receipt for Money Received By Special Agent from SAC to Pay Source or Informant.  [Agent submits request to his SAC on FD-235]
 

FD-221A
 
Field Office SAC Request for Authorization To Pay Expenses Related To Informant
 

FD-221B
 
Receipt For Monies Paid For Services
 

FD-227
 
Field Office Request o HQ for Authorization of Mail Cover
 

FD-230
 
Certificate [Affirms individual not member of or affiliated with or associated with any organization on Attorney General’s List of Subversive Organizations]
 

FD-238
 
Security Informant Review Sheet [Checklist of items to be discussed with informant including background information required such as credit history, local criminal record, selective service status, armed services record, reliability, reputation. Informant also to be advised that he/she was not Bureau employee and their activities were voluntary, and informant should not retain copies of notes or reports and any payments made must be reported to IRS.]
 

FD-245
 
FBI File Cover Form [Form attached to front of each file section which lists the file number, the section number, and the serial numbers contained in that section.  Sometimes, it also lists other files which are pertinent to the case such as related files on individuals or the equivalent HQ file numbers.]
 

FD-245a
 
FBI File Cover Form For “Field Office Informant and Asset Files”
 

FD-249
 
Arrest Fingerprint Card
 

FD-256
 
Number 3 Card [Apparently intended for Agent use to list their anticipated activities for each day.]
 

FD-258
 
Applicant Fingerprint Card
 

FD-263
 
Cover Page of FBI Report [Usually contains “Synopsis” of information in the report along with distribution of copies (such as to other FBI offices, and/or to Army Intelligence (G-2 or INTC=U.S. Army Intelligence Corps), Naval Intelligence (ONI or NCIS), Air Force Intelligence (OSI),  U.S. Secret Service, INS, BATF, or other agencies.]
 

FD-266
 
Field Office Request for Information on Person From Another Field Office
 

FD-272
 
Cover Page for Report Being Sent Outside FBI [Form shows title of case, character of case, Agent who wrote the report, the investigative time period, the office of origin, and distribution of report and the identity of informants used for information contained in the report.  This cover page would be attached to FD-204 and probably was detached before mailing.]
 

FD-302
 
Interview Report in Security Type Investigations (Reports by Special Agents)
 

FD-305
 
Summary of Background Information and Subversive Activity on Person
 

FD-306
 
Cover Sheet For Informant Report or Material
 

FD-315
 
FBI Request to Immigration and Naturalization Service
 

FD-338
 
Authorization For Destruction of Individual Serials
 

FD-340A
 
Envelope [Envelope placed in front or back of files for storing evidence that may be needed in court proceedings such as photographs, surveillance logs, signed statements, etc.]
 

FD-341
 
Radio Equipment Maintenance Log
 

FD-348
 
Source Information Card
 

FD-350
 
Form for Mounting Newspaper Clippings
 

FD-353
 
Fingerprint Card
 

FD-365
 
Transmittal Form From SAC of Field Office to HQ
 

FD-366
 
Change of Address on Subject of Investigation
 

 
FD-376
 
Information Sent to Secret Service {Can be on potentially dangerous person “because of background, emotional instability, or activity in groups engaged in activities inimical to U.S.” or because of “threats or actions against persons protected by Secret Service” or person who made “threatening or abusive statement about U.S. or foreign official” or person who has participated “in civil disturbances, anti U.S. demonstrations or hostile incidents against foreign diplomatic establishments” or person who has “expressed strong anti-U.S. sentiments“ or “antipathy toward good order and government” or person engaged in “illegal bombing, bomb-making, or other terrorist activity”]
 

FD-397
 
Adding/Removing Subject to Rabble Rouser or Agitator Index
 

FD-401
 
Informant Progress/Justification Letter
 

FD-405
 
Status Report, Racial Informants, Extremist Groups (White-Black)—Racial Matters
 

FD-411
 
Selective Service – Case Closed Form
 

FD-503
 
Inventory Worksheet – For Court Ordered List of Documents
 

FD-553
 
US Army to FBI re: AWOL’s
 

FD-610
 
Route Slip From SAC of Field Office to Civil Rights Unit of Criminal Investigative Division
 

ND-5
 
National Defense Division Route Slip (1940)
 

ND-32
 
Security Division Route Slip (1942)
 

10 or 64
 
U.S. Government Memo
 

O-1
 
HQ Request That Field Office Submit Report or Explain Why Not Submitted; Status Report
 

O-7
 
Routing Slip To Field or Legat Offices
 

O-9
 
HQ Criticism of Field Office Handling of Case
 

O-17
 
HQ To Field Office re: Communication Containing an Error
 

O-25
 
Route Slip
 

O-73
 
Message Relay Form from Director to SAC’s and to Outside Agencies
 

2-11
 
In-Service Course [Form used to specify what type of courses an Agent was scheduled to attend – such as Security, Criminal or General]
 

3-43
 
Administrative Division Route Slip – Personnel Section
 

3-46
 
Administrative Division Route Slip -- Internal
 

4-11
 
Records and Communication Division Route Slip
 

4-22

4-22A
 
FBI Records Section – Search Form [Identifies files/serials identified as potentially responsive to search instructions and the type of search requested -- such as “all references” or just “subversive” or “criminal” or “non-subversive” or “main file” references.  Search instructions can be restricted to specific locality or to an exact name – or instructions can be more expansive such as requesting search for all name variations.]
 

4-76
 
Crime Records Section Route Slip
 

4-257
 
Authorization For Sending File to “Special Files Room” aka JUNE Mail
 

4-312
 
Incoming JUNE Mail and Date When Sent to Special Files Room in Records Branch
 

4-413
 
Serial Chargeout
 

4-528
 
Serial “Changed To”  form – for serial moved to another file
 

4-750
 
FOIPA Deleted Page Information Sheet
 

5-1
 
Central Research Section – Subscription Status [Used to communicate with field office regarding what publications and/or subscriptions HQ wanted field offices to obtain.  HQ memos usually were captioned “Publications—Handling of By Research-Satellite Section”
 (or Central Research Section) and data was provided re: routing and distribution.
 

5-6
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – Internal Security Section – Route Slip
 

5-7
 
Domestic Intelligence Division Route Slip = Internal
 

5-9
 
Domestic Intelligence Division Route Slip – External
 

5-10
 
Domestic Intelligence Division - Research—Satellite Section - Route Slip
 

5-78
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – Subversive Control Section – Route Slip (later known as Extremist Intelligence Section)
 

5-103
 
Central Research Section Book Review Request Form
 

5-113
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – “Informative Note”
 

6-48
 
Fraud, Selective Service and Civil Section Route Slip
 

7-1B
 
Report of FBI Laboratory
 

8-3
 
Crime Records Division Route Slip
 

8-115
 
Correspondence and Tours Section Route Slip
 

17-1
 
FOIPA Form – Prior To National Security Classification Review
 

 


Section VI = FBI OFFICE CODES 


FBI OFFICE CODES:

 Most FBI field offices were identified by their two-character abbreviations. [One exception is Washington field which was WFO.] A complete list appears here:

http://www.historyofphonephreaking.org/writings/htraff/fbi-office-abbreviations.php 

Foreign offices (Legal Attaches) were identified by three-character abbreviations – such as MEX for Mexico City, Mexico or OTT for Ottawa, Canada.

 FBI CODED MESSAGES TO OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCIES


CODE
 
Agency / Recipient
 

RUEBWJA
 
ATTORNEY GENERAL / DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL / ASST ATTORNEY GENERAL – CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION

ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL – CRIMINAL DIVISION OR INTERNAL SECURITY SECTION

U.S. MARSHAL’S SERVICE / INS 
 

RUEBJGA
 
COMMANDANT, U.S. COAST GUARD
 

RUEBDUA
 
DEPARTMENT OF THE AIR FORCE
 

RUEASCI
 
DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY
 

RUEBJGA
 
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
 

RUEAIIA
 
DIRECTOR, CIA
 

RUEKJCS
 
DIRECTOR, DEFENSE INTELLIGENCE AGENCY
 

RUEABND
 
DRUG ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION
 

RHEGGTN
 
ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEOGBA
 
FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEANAT
 
NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEOIAA
 
NATIONAL SECURITY AGENCY
 

RUEOLKN
 
NAVAL INVESTIGATIVE SERVICE
 

RUEADWW
 
THE PRESIDENT / VICE PRESIDENT / WHITE HOUSE SITUATION ROOM
 

RUEAUSA
 
U.S. POSTAL SERVICE (IF CLASSIFIED)
 

RUEVDFS
 
U.S. POSTAL SERVICE (IF UNCLASSIFIED)
 

RUEHSE
 
U.S. SECRET SERVICE
 

RUEHOC
 
U.S. SECRETARY OF STATE
 
 





 
















 
 
 



 



foia‎ > ‎ 

FBI-INFO 




Revised 06/05/15



This webpage will be devoted to explaining FBI abbreviations, acronyms, terminology, codes and standard forms used by the FBI.   It will be periodically updated to incorporate new information.




QUESTIONS/COMMENTS = ernie1241@aol.com 


FBI ABBREVIATIONS, ACRONYMS and TERMINOLOGY

This chart contains some of the more interesting and/or more common terms seen in FBI documents.  
   

TERM
 
Meaning
 

AAG
 
Assistant Attorney General
 

ADEX
 
Administrative Index (began 11/71) as successor to FBI Security Index and Reserve Index.  ADEX was discontinued in January 1976.
 

ADIC
 
Assistant Director in Charge
 

ADMINISTRATIVE PAGE
 
FBI reports usually contained data which was not to be shared outside the Bureau and that data was placed upon an “Administrative Page” that was detached when reports were sent to other agencies.  Typically, an Administrative Page contained the identity of T-sources and details regarding leads which should be pursued by specific field offices.   In some cases (particularly very lengthy serials), the information which normally appeared on Administrative Pages would, instead, be placed on “Cover Pages” at the beginning of Agent reports.
 

AEC
 
Atomic Energy Commission
 

AFB
 
Air Force Base
 

AFSA
 
Armed Forces Security Agency – the predecessor to National Security Agency
 

AG
 
Attorney General
 

AI
 
Agitator Index (began 8/4/67) as successor to Rabble Rouser Index.
 

AIRTEL

REURAIRTEL
 
An Airtel was an expedited form of communication between and among FBI offices and it was meant to apply to letters that should be typed and mailed on same day and usually sent by airmail.  Airtels were often classified and/or encrypted messages.  It originally was received as a teletype sent by airmail and, therefore, could be in teletype terminology.

 

“Reurairtel” was abbreviation for “regarding your airtel” referring to a previous communication sent to some office.
 

AL
 
Alien
 

ALEM PROGRAM
 
This program was initiated in August 1965 based upon information provided to the FBI by a KGB officer (stationed at the United Nations and serving as a Soviet diplomat) who became an FBI informant.  His FBI code name was “Fedora” and he is widely believed to be Yerbas Lichi aka Victor M. Lesovski or Lessiovski. 

The ALEM program apparently was designed to identify Soviet nationals through research into “INS cards” who “have entered the United States under assumed identities as (1) alien husbands of American wives or (2) male immigrants on first preference petitions due to professional and technical skills.”  According to one 1972 FBI document, about 2250 cases were opened under this program and it was supervised in the Special Case Unit of the Espionage Section by Special Agent G.M. Quinn.  [HQ 65-69532]
 

AMERICAN LEGION CONTACT PROGRAM
 
American Legion members were used by FBI as sources of information about security-related matters in their local communities.  This program began in November 1940 and ended in August 1954.
 

AMSD
 
Air Mail, Special Delivery
 

ARL
 
Anti-Riot Law Statutes
 

ASA
 
U.S. Army Security Agency
 

ASAC
 
Assistant Special Agent in Charge of a Field Office
 

ASCI
 
Assistant Chief of Staff For Intelligence (U.S. Army or U.S. Air Force)
 

ASN
 
Army Serial Number
 

ASSISTANT DIRECTOR
 
FBI employee in Charge of each Division at FBI HQ as well as the New York and Los Angeles field offices
 

ATTORNEY GENERAL PORTFOLIO
 
A secret plan which originated in 1948 which provided for the detention of U.S. citizens deemed to be threats to national security in times of national emergency.  The detention program became known as the AG Portfolio and involved suspension of the writ of habeas corpus and use of a Master Search Warrant.  Also see: Security Index Program
 

AUSA
 
Assistant United States Attorney
 

BAMM
 
Black Afro Militant Movement (Alfred Featherstone)
 

BANPOP PROGRAM
 
There is a cryptic description of this program in one heavily redacted FBI document.  Apparently, it had something to do with discovering “funding Soviet illegals” through access to bank records. The program was terminated on August 15, 1972. [HQ 65-70741]
 

BAPBOMB
 
FBI case re: 1963 bombing of Birmingham AL church that killed 4 black girls
 

BATF
 
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms
 

BEM
 
Business Executives Movement For Vietnam
 

BLACK BAG JOBS
 
FBI burglaries used to obtain subscription and membership lists, financial records, correspondence and photographs of documents on targeted individuals and organizations.  Also known as surreptitious entries.  In 1942, a special filing procedure was introduced for information obtained through break-ins.  Field offices requests for permission were captioned “Do Not File” so that such documentary evidence would not be serialized or indexed in the FBI’s Central Records System.  Instead, such files were kept in the office of the Assistant Director having supervisory responsibility and the files were to be destroyed every six months.  [HQ 66-8160]
 

BLIND MEMO
 
Memo written by FBI employees but not containing any markings that refer to the FBI as the source.
 

BM

BM-THREATS
 
Bombing Matter
 

BNPA
 
Black Nationalist Photographic Album.  This album was established in 1968 and contained photos and biographies of prominent black leaders who travelled extensively
 

BOCOV
 
Communist Coverage Along Mexican Border (initiated 1948; HQ 100-356015)
 

BOSS
 
Bureau of Special Services – New York Police Department aka Bureau of Special Services and Investigations
 

BPP

BPP-CF
 
Black Panther Party / Black Panther Party—Cleaver Faction
 

BRILAB
 
Bribery of Labor Officials – FBI undercover sting operation which began in 1979 and targeted organized crime and corrupt politicians.
 

BUFILE
 
FBI HQ main file
 

BUG
 
A listening device usually referred to as MISUR (microphone surveillance) or ELSUR (electronic surveillance)
 

BULET
 
Bureau letter
 

BULKY EXHIBITS
 
Material obtained during the course of an investigation which is too voluminous to be placed inside main file and, thus, was kept separately in a Bulky Exhibit Room and filed by case number.
 

BWP
 
Bureau War Plans
 

CANIL PROGRAM
 
There is a cryptic description of this program in one heavily redacted FBI document.  Apparently, it had something to do with “uncovering Soviet illegals”.  [HQ 65-70719]
 

CAP
 
Congress of African People’s
 

CAS
 
Chinese Activities Summary [HQ 105-229211]
 

CENTRAL RECORDS SYSTEM
 
Primary filing system used by FBI
 

CHANNELIZE
 
Copies of memos which are placed into specific pertinent files
 

CHICOIN
 
Counterintelligence Operations Against Chinese Communist Intelligence Activities in the U.S. (began 5/65 = HQ 105-135614)
 

CHICOM
 
Chinese Communists
 

CHIEF CLERK
 
FBI employee responsible for indexing documents and routing files to appropriate employee(s)
 

CI
 
Communist Index – was established in 1948 for individuals who did not meet Security Index requirements but were suspected of being Communist sympathizers.  In 1960 it was changed to Reserve Index.
 

CI
 
Criminal Informant or Confidential Informant
 

CIC
 
Counter-Intelligence Corps of U.S. Army
 

CINAL
 
Current Intelligence Analysis – CINAL information was disseminated to Executive Branch officials
 

CIRM
 
Communist Influence in Racial Matters
 

CNDI
 
Confidential National Defense Informant
 

COBICS
 
Communist Bloc Information Collation System
 

COI
 
Conflict of Interest
 

COINTELPRO
 
Counterintelligence Program.   The FBI’s COINTELPRO program was designed to disrupt and neutralize individuals and organizations thought to be a security problem for our country.
 

COINTELPRO-WHG
 
Counterintelligence Program: White Hate Groups (began 09/64 as effort to neutralize white extremist organizations, leaders, and their adherents. About 17 FBI field offices were involved. Program was discontinued 4/27/71.)  [HQ 157-9]
 

COKMA
 
Coverage of Known Meet Areas (i.e. Surveillance of Soviet Agents/Sources) [HQ 65-73750]
 

COMINFIL
 
Communist Infiltration Of
 

COMINT
 
Communications Intelligence (NSA reports)
 

COMPIC
 
Communist Infiltration of Motion Picture Industry (HQ 100-138754)
 

COMPROS
 
Communist Prosecutions (aka Smith Act Trials)
 

COMSAB
 
Potential Communist Saboteurs (FBI program used to identify Security Index individuals who were thought to have potential for sabotage because of their training or their connection to key strategic industries and installations.)
 





CONF INFT
 
Confidential Informant.  The FBI uses various descriptive phrases to describe or evaluate their informants.  Among the most common:

·         Has furnished reliable information in the past

·         Of unknown reliability

·         Of known unreliability

·         Of known reliability

·         Has supplied insufficient information to determine reliability

In addition, a percentage of reliability could be used to describe informant.
 

CONFIDENTIAL
 
Document containing information related to national defense – provided by sources whose identities should not be revealed
 

CONFIDENTIAL SOURCE
 
Individuals who furnish the FBI information available to them through their employment or their position in the community. The FBI Manual of Instruction, circa 1975 cites as examples of confidential sources "bankers, telephone company employees, and landlords."

Confidential Source was established as a category in March 1950.  The FBI Manual of Instructions (Section 107-T) provides instructions to field offices regarding procedures to follow.   FBI HQ authorization was required to initiate contact with a CS involved with Communist or related investigations.  In these instances, field offices were required to submit detailed background information to HQ regarding the source's date and place of birth, citizenship status. residence, employment, credit and criminal record and military service record (if any).  In addition, a brief history of source's affiliation with CPUSA or other organizations and results of interview with him/her.   Bureau clearance was not required for CS contacted in connection with criminal matters.
 

CONTROL FILE
 
A control file is usually created only for the most important FBI cases and it contains instructions sent to field offices along with results of investigations.  Statistical information is often included in a Control File.
 

COORNAP
 
Adolph Coors Kidnapping Case [HQ 7-9575]
 

CORRELATION SUMMARY
 
A correlation summary was usually limited to large case files.  The summary lists all file and serial numbers along with a brief synopsis of their content which contain important information about a particular person.
 

COSMIC
 
NATO classification for highly secret documents.  Used over and above “Top Secret”.  HQ 62-9871
 

COVER PAGE
 
Summary memoranda or reports usually begin with page(s) which have administrative data, leads which should be pursued by specified field offices, and perhaps informant evaluations but the cover pages were not sent outside the Bureau.  Usually the cover page(s) were designated with alphabetic letters, “A” “B” etc.
 

CRD
 
Civil Rights Division – U.S Department of Justice
 

CROSS REFERENCE

aka see refs
 
A cross reference is a mention of a subject in a file on another individual, organization, event, activity, etc.
 

C-TE
 
Criminal Top Echelon Informants
 

CUSTODIAL DETENTION
 
Program which was initiated as result of directive of President Roosevelt in September 1939 to list individuals whom should be considered for apprehension and detention in event of national emergency. It subsequently became known as Security Index.  (HQ 100-358086)
 

CP or CPUSA
 
Communist Party USA
 

CR
 
Civil Rights
 

CRA-64
 
Civil Rights Act of 1964
 

CS
 
Confidential Source (usually given a source number)
 

DA / PDA
 
Double Agent / Potential Double Agent
 

DABURN
 
FBI code name for file pertaining to January 11, 1966 murder of Vernon F. Dahmer Sr. of Forrest County MS by several Klan members. Thirteen men, who were connected with the Ku Klux Klan, were eventually brought to trial in the late 1960s on charges that ranged from conspiracy to intimidate, to arson and murder. At that time, however, only four of the men were convicted and one entered a guilty plea. 


 In the late 1990s three men, Samuel H. Bowers Jr., Charles Noble, and Deavours Nix, were arrested again in connection with the Dahmer murder. Sam Bowers, the Imperial Wizard of the Ku Klux Klan, had previously been tried four times for the crimes committed on the Dahmer family, however each trial ended in a mistrial. Although Bowers was not present at the attack on the Dahmer home in 1966, he was accused of having ordered the attack to take place. In August of 1998, Bowers was tried for the fifth time in connection with the Dahmer murder, and this time he was convicted of murder and arson and received a sentence of life in prison.  Charles Noble was tried in connection with the Dahmer murder in 1999, however his trial ended in a mistrial. Deavours Nix died before his trial took place
 

DCI
 
Director, Central Intelligence Agency
 

DCII
 
Defense Central Index of Investigations
 

DEAD FILE
 
File created by field office when no immediate investigation is warranted but they anticipate opening case file in the near future
 

DECLASSIFY
 
Procedure to remove security classification (confidential, secret, or top secret)  from documents or files 
 

DEPAMD
 
Deception Program For Anti-Missile Defense [HQ 65-66140]
 

DESECO
 
Development of Selected Contacts Against Soviet-Bloc Officials (initiated 12/57, HQ 105-71688). FBI interviewed Americans who returned from Soviet Bloc countries.
 

DETCOM
 
Detention of Communists -- Program to detain known or suspected Communist Party members in time of national emergency. [HQ 100-356062]
 

DID
 
FBI Domestic Intelligence Division (formerly Security Division)
 

DIO
 
District Intelligence Office (Office of Naval Intelligence)
 

DIP
 
Defectors-In-Place
 

DIVISION 5
 
FBI Domestic Intelligence Division (formerly Security Division or National Defense Division)
 

DO NOT FILE
 
Procedure designed to keep sensitive documents out of the Bureau’s normal Central Records System
 

DOUBLE ZERO FILES
 
00 Files are FBI Control Files – which concern policy and procedure
 

DPOB
 
Date and Place of Birth
 

EASTCON
 
East Coast Conspiracy To Save Lives
 

EBF
 
Enclosure Behind File – i.e. usually copies of publications which, due to space considerations, FBI HQ did not want to incorporate into the main file but would be filed separately “behind” the main file
 

EDP
 
Emergency Detention Program (also see: DETCOM).  The EDP was based upon Title II of the Internal Security Act of 1950. [HQ 100-398030]
 

EGIS
 
East German Intelligence Service
 

ELSUR
 
Electronic Surveillance Index – was a card file of subjects mentioned in electronic surveillances
 

EM
 
Extremist Matter
 

ENC or ENCL
 
Enclosure – such as a publication which was enclosed with a letter sent to the Bureau.  As a result, the serial number might reflect this:  HQ 100-1234, #8, enclosure – which means that serial #8 has an enclosure.
 

EO
 
Presidential Executive Order
 

EOD
 
Entered on Duty (date)
 

EPA
 
Extremist Photograph Album
 

ESP
 
Espionage
 

ESTABLISHED SOURCE
 
Any source with whom the FBI developed a relationship over time and who was trusted to keep relationship confidential.  Usually a Confidential Source rather than a paid informant.
 

EX or EX-CS
 
Extremist / Extremist Confidential Source
 

EXP PROC
 
Expedite Processing
 

EXTREMIST ACTIVITIES
 
Activities whose objective is overthrowing, destroying or undermining the U.S. Government by illegal means OR denying Constitutional rights to American citizens.  The FBI used “Extremist” to describe ethnic radicals, members of white hate groups, and black or native American radicals.  The FBI unit which covered these matters was originally called Racial Intelligence Section but changed to Extremist Section in September 1967.
 

FAG
 
Fraud Against The Government
 

FBI 

IDENTIFICATION NUMBER
 
Usually associated with FBI “rap sheet” which lists arrests made by law enforcement agencies and ultimate disposition of cases.
 

FBW
 
Fraud By Wire
 

FEDORA
 
FBI Code Name for KGB Official Working at United Nations Who Was FBI Informant [HQ 105-104811]
 

FCI
 
Foreign Counterintelligence
 

FGE
 
Foreign Government Employee
 

FGJ
 
Federal Grand Jury
 

FINAL
 
Foreign Intelligence Analysis
 

FISUR
 
Physical Surveillance
 

FLD
 
Foreign Liaison Desk
 

FNU
 
First Name Unknown
 

FPC
 
Fingerprint Classification
 

FPC
 
Foreign Police Cooperation Program
 

FUDE
 
Fugitive / Deserter
 

G-2
 
Army Intelligence (Office of Assistant Chief of Staff)
 

GHETTO INFORMANT PROGRAM
 
Initiated June 1967 to monitor black radicals
 

GID
 
General Investigative Division / General Intelligence Division
 

GRU
 
Soviet Military Intelligence
 

GUS SURVEY
 
Program whereby FBI field offices examined mail in certain locations in attempt to locate mail intended for Soviet illegal agents.  [HQ 65-67003]
 

HEARNAP
 
Kidnapping of Patricia Hearst [HQ 7-15200]
 

HILEV
 
High Level (term usually used in connection with intelligence information such as HILEV items or data received from some source)
 

HSCA
 
House Select Committee on Assassinations [HQ 62-117290]
 

HCUA or HUAC
 
House Committee on Un-American Activities – succeeded by House Internal Security Committee
 

I
 
On FBI Search Slips – means “identical”, i.e. the file reference is about the person or organization which has been searched.  “NI” meant “not identical”, i.e. reference is to another person of same name.
 

IAC
 
Intelligence Advisory Committee [HQ 62-90718]
 

ICIS
 
Interdepartmental Committee on Internal Security
 

IDENTIFICATION DIVISION
 
FBI HQ Division which has control of fingerprints, wanted notices, and missing persons notices
 

IEC
 
Intelligence Evaluation Committee
 

IIC
 
Interdepartmental Intelligence Conference
 

IICC
 
Interagency Intelligence Coordinating Committee
 

INLET
 
Intelligence Letter through which FBI regularly furnished the President and Attorney General “high level intelligence data in the internal security field…on a continuous basis” starting in November 1969. The type of information provided included status of internal security cases, intelligence trends, foreign intelligence, inside information regarding demonstrations or civil unrest of more than local significance and “items with an unusual twist or concerning prominent personalities which may be of special interest to the President or Attorney General.”
 

INTC
 
U.S. Army Intelligence Corps
 

IOB
 
International Operations Branch
 

ISA 1950
 
Internal Security Act of 1950
 

IS-C

IS-SWP

SM-C

ANP-RM
 
FBI memos often contain abbreviations to indicate the nature of the matter being discussed.  In the examples at left the explanations are as follows:

IS-C = Internal Security-Communist

IS-SWP = Internal Security–Socialist Workers Party

SM-C = Security Matter, Communist

ANP-RM = American Nazi Party--Racial Matter
 

ISD
 
Internal Security Division, U.S. Department of Justice
 

ISL
 
Independent Socialist League
 

ITSP
 
Interstate Transportation of Stolen Property
 

JUNE MAIL
 
Separate filing method used by FBI starting in June 1949 to keep certain info confidential and not serialized in a Special Files Room – particularly information which the FBI obtained through wiretaps, black bag jobs, or extremely sensitive sources.
 

KBE
 
Key Black Extremist
 

KF
 
Key Figures
 

KFL
 
Key Facilities List
 

KGB
 
Soviet Committee For State Security
 

KHRUSVIS
 
Soviet Premier Nikita Khrushchev Visit to U.S. 1960 [HQ 62-104045]
 

LCN
 
La Cosa Nostra
 

LEGAT
 
Legal Attache offices – i.e. FBI offices operating in foreign countries (Beirut, Bern, Bogota, Bonn, Caracas, Copenhagen, Hong Kong, La Paz, London, Madrid, Managua, Manila, Mexico City, Ottawa, Panama, Paris, Rome, Tel Aviv, Tokyo)
 

LHM
 
Letterhead Memorandum – FBI summary intended for other agencies but which conceals confidential sources.
 

LIAISON PROGRAM
 
Every FBI Field office kept lists of people whom were to be contacted on regular schedule for “good will” purposes and to obtain information from them.  Included airlines, banks, defense contractors, hotels, trucking companies, federal agencies, police departments, news media, etc.
 

LIAISON SOURCE
 
Officer or leader of legitimate civil rights organization who provided FBI with advance information concerning activities of his organization (as of March 1970, there were 1975 liaison sources)
 

LMRA-1947
 
Labor-Management Relations Act of 1947
 

LNU
 
Last Name Unknown
 

MAIL COVER
 
Procedure by which the Post Office recorded names and addresses of sender and recipient of letters
 

MAIN FILE

SUB-A FILE

SUB-B FILE

 
 
A “main file” usually contains all the memos and investigative reports about people or organizations to which the FBI gives specific sequential serial numbers and they are indexed in the FBI’s General Index aka Central Records System. 

The “sub files” designated “A” or “B” usually contain material which is similar to EBF’s, i.e. copies of publications authored or disseminated by individuals or organizations (such as their newsletters, pamphlets, press releases, etc). plus newspaper/magazine articles about the individual or organization. Most sub-files are designated “1A” and each individual item may be given a number such as “1A-1” then “1A-2” etc.  Some of the largest files also contain sub-B files and those follow the same pattern for each new item added, i.e. 1B-1, 1B-2, etc.

Note #1:  If an FOIA requester wants everything that the FBI has about a particular subject, the request should specify “main files” and “sub-files” OR “main files” and “sub-A” and “sub-B” files.  Often, the FBI will not process sub-files unless specifically asked.

Note #2:  There is another type of “sub-file” such as when, after the FBI HQ created a main file on a particular subject, it then also created additional files on the same subject but broken down into sub-files to capture information provided by specific persons or about specific geographical locations or other categories.  For example, a HQ main file on informants might be designated as HQ 66-45, but reports that came from one specific informant might be placed in 66-45, sub-264. 

Another possibility is when files were created on a specific organization or subject (such as the Communist Party or the Citizens Council Movement or United Klans of America or the FBI's COINTELPRO programs) and then sub-files were created for pertinent information about specific cities, counties, states, or neighborhoods.  

For example:  the HQ main file on the Citizens Council movement is HQ 105-34237.  The HQ file on the Citizens Councils in Atlanta was HQ 105-34237-2 and for Knoxville was HQ 105-34237-24.   

The HQ main file on COINTELPRO-White Hate Groups is 157-9 but there are HQ sub-files for specific cities such as:  HQ 157-9-4 (Birmingham AL), and 157-9-9 (Chicago IL).
 

MDC
 
May Day Collective
 

MEDBURG
 
Burglary of Media PA FBI office in 1971
 

MEMORANDUM
 
Typically, a communication from FBI to other Justice Department officials such as Attorney General or from one FBI employee to another FBI employee
 

MIBURN
 
Mississippi Burning – 1964 Murders of Civil Rights Workers (Schwerner, Goodman, Cheney)
 

MID
 
Military Intelligence Division
 

MIDEM
 
FBI coverage of 1972 Democratic Convention demonstrators (Miami FL)
 

MIG
 
Military Intelligence Group (US Army)
 

MIPORN
 
Miami FL Pornography Case – Undercover operation into porn industry and film piracy
 

MISUR
 
Microphone Surveillance (often from illegal break-in or burglary)
 

MOCASE
 
Morros Case or Moscow Case – Soviet espionage network in U.S. during 1940’s involving FBI double agent Boris Morros. [HQ 100-352385]
 

MURKIN
 
Murder of Martin Luther King Jr. [HQ 44-38861, Memphis 44-1987, Atlanta 44-2386]
 

MYLETS
 
My Letters Dated…
 

NA
 
Naturalized Citizen
 

NAME CHECK
 
Requests from other agencies for loyalty information on its current or prospective employees
 

NAS
 
Naval Air Station [usually a reference to FBI reports sent to local Office of Naval Intelligence]
 

NB
 
Native Born
 

NCIC
 
National Crime Information Center
 

NEWKILL
 
FBI case pertaining to May 1971 murder of two New York City policemen
 

NI
 
Not identical
 

NIS or NISO
 
Naval Investigative Service Office (successor to ONI)
 

NMI
 
No Middle Initial
 

NMN
 
No Middle Name
 

NO CONTACT LIST
 
Critics of FBI or of FBI Director J. Edgar Hoover Whom Were Not To Be Contacted
 

NO SEGEGRABLE INFO
 
When the FBI decides to apply a literal interpretation of the subject of an FOIA request, it may not release entire pages or sections of a serial by claiming there is “no segregable material” or information.  For example:  if an FOIA request is made on Joe Smith and the FBI discovers a 50-page serial that includes references to Joe Smith on 11 pages, the FBI can choose to deny the other pages or heavily redact them claiming “no segregable material”.
 

NOI
 
Nation of Islam
 

NPAC
 
National Peace Action Coalition
 

NPR
 
Nationalist Party of Puerto Rico
 

NSA
 
National Security Agency
 

NSD
 
FBI National Security Division
 

NSWPP
 
National Socialist White People’s Party (successor to American Nazi Party)
 

O&C
 
 “Official and Confidential Files” were highly sensitive files which were kept in the office of FBI Director Hoover and Assistant Director Louis B. Nichols (over 250 folders)

See: http://www.marquette.edu/library/archives/Mss/FBI/FBI-series16.shtml 
 

OASCI
 
Office of Assistant Chief of Staff For Intelligence (US Army)
 

OFFICE CONTACTS
 
Usually business people or others who could be relied upon to provide information.  Each field office had a contact program whereby they would establish liaison with local groups and enterprises in their community. These were mostly goodwill efforts, but did provide venues for the Bureau to talk about issues that might affect the group or its members, and to solicit their help in the form of confidential sources or panel sources.
 

ONI
 
Office of Naval Intelligence
 

OO
 
Office of Origin – i.e. the FBI office which opened the investigation and is primarily responsible for the case.  For example, New York City is the OO for the Communist Party USA so FBI files reflect “OO:NYC”
 

OPERATION SHAMROCK
 
Program under which the NSA received copies of most international telegrams leaving the U.S. from RCA, ITT, and Western Union. At one point, it was proposed that the FBI assume responsibility for this program.
 

OSI
 
Air Force Intelligence (Office of Special Investigations)
 

P&C
 
Personal and Confidential
 

PANEL SOURCE
 
Panel sources are defined as individuals who are not involved in an investigated group but who "will attend its public gatherings on behalf of FBI for intelligence purposes or as potential witnesses." Panel sources were first developed to meet the need for witnesses in the course of Smith Act trials of Communist Party members in the 1950s. In those trials, it was necessary to prove simple facts as to the existence of the Communist Party, the dates and places of public meetings held by the Party, and similar matters. To avoid surfacing and exposing regular FBI informants within the Party to establish such facts, panel sources were developed. 
 

PCI
 
Potential Criminal Informant
 

PCPJ
 
People’s Coalition For Peace and Justice
 

PLAIN TEXT
 
Information Written Without Using Code
 

PLANT INFORMANT
 
Created in September 1940 to develop FBI sources of information in defense plants.  By September 1942 there were 23,746 Plant Informants in 3879 plants.  Program ended in March 1969.
 

PLP
 
Progressive Labor Party
 

PPA
 
Proletarian Party of America
 

PRELIMINARY INQUIRY
 
Preliminary inquiries were conducted by FBI to obtain information about a person or organization by using mostly public sources (such as media coverage, library resources such as Who’s Who directories) along with FBI informants and established sources in order to determine if a formal investigation was warranted because of suspected criminal or subversive activities or any potential violations of federal laws.  A preliminary inquiry often lasted only 1-3 months.
 

PRETEXT CALL
 
A pretext is an investigative technique used to obtain background and identifying information or photographs of an individual without identifying the FBI as the interested party. An example would be an Agent who makes a phone call to verify someone’s home address, where he/she can be reached, their employment, or their current location etc.  Sometimes calls are made just to record the voice of a suspect or to obtain literature regarding a new organization.  Pretexts can also be used to gain access to a property.  The FBI published a 35-page monograph in May 1956 entitled “Pretexts and Cover Techniques” which was used for Agent training purposes.
 

PRO
 
Prominent Person
 

PROSAB
 
Protection Against Sabotage of Strategic Air Command Bases
 

PROSECUTIVE SUMMARY
 
FBI field office report which summarizes evidence and availability of witnesses in a case under investigation.
 

PSI or PCI
 
Potential Security Informant / Potential Confidential Informant (persons designated as potential informants were not yet established as reliable information sources and that process might take a year for the FBI to make a conclusion with respect to their reliability.)
 

RA
 
Registration Act aka Foreign Agents Registration Act  of 1938 (usually pertains to cases of individuals who may not have completed required forms to register with U.S. Justice Dept because of their activities on behalf of a foreign government – such as seeking to influence legislation pending before Congress or providing public relations services for a foreign government.)
 

RA
 
Resident Agency (small satellite office of main FBI field office)
 

RABBLE ROUSER INDEX
 
Created in August 1967 (abolished April 1971) to identify individuals with propensity for inciting violence (later known as Agitator Index).  It was initially described as an Index designed to capture background information on individuals "who have demonstrated by their actions and speeches that they have a propensity for fomenting racial disorder."  {SAC Letter 67-47).

A subsequent SAC Letter (67-70) stated:

"A rabble rouser is defined as a person who tries to arouse people to violent action by appealing to their emotions, prejudices, etc., a demagogue. You will note that under prior criteria the Rabble Rouser Index served as an index only for individuals of national prominence with particular consideration given to those who travel extensively and was limited to those fomenting racial disorder.  It is the intent of this expanded criteria to have within each division as well as nationwide an index of agitators of all types whose activities have a bearing on the national security.  This would include, for example, black nationalists, white supremacists, Puerto Rican nationalists, anti-Vietnam demonstration leaders, and other extremists." 
 

RACON
 
Racial Conditions
 

REBULET
 
Referring to previous Bureau Letter (with date)
 

REBUTEL
 
Referring to previous teletype from Bureau (with date)
 

REMYLET
 
Referring to My Letter (with date)
 

REPORT
 
Written document prepared by field office containing the results of its investigation.
 

REREP
 
Referring to Report By
 

RESERVE INDEX
 
Created in June 1960 and abolished September 1971.  One FBI memo describes Reserve Index as “comprised of individuals with subversive backgrounds not meeting the Security Index criteria but who in a time of national emergency are in a position to influence others against the national interest.  The RI is broken down into two sections, A and B, with A containing the names of those individuals who in time of national emergency are in a position to influence others against the national interest or are likely to furnish material financial aid to subversive elements due to their subversive associates and ideology."

Section A consisted of teachers, journalists, lawyers and other professionals.  Section B contained all other Reserve Index subjects.  Martin Luther King Jr. and Norman Mailer were on Reserve Index.
 

REURAIRTEL
 
Referring to Your Airtel
 

REUREP
 
Referring to Your Report
 

REURLET
 
Referring to Your Letter
 

REURTEL
 
Referring to Your Teletype or Telegram
 

RFMT
 
Radio Frequency Microphone Telephone Device
 

RI
 
Racial Informant
 

RM
 
Racial Matter
 

RNA
 
Republic of New Africa (Milton and Richard Henry)
 

RUC
 
Referred Upon Completion To Office of Origin – i.e. one field office has completed whatever it was asked to do and it is referring the matter back to the original office for any further action
 

RYM
 
Revolutionary Youth Movement
 

SA
 
FBI Special Agent
 

SAC
 
FBI Special Agent in Charge of a Field Office
 

SAC LETTER
 
Instructions to FBI field offices from HQ
 

SACB
 
Subversive Activities Control Board
 

SATPIA
 
Satellite Personnel Intelligence Assets
 

SBIS
 
Soviet Bloc Intelligence Services
 

SDS
 
Students For A Democratic Society
 

SEARCH SLIP
 
Lists file numbers and serials containing references to subject of search.  Could be limited to only “subversive” or “criminal” or “non-subversive” references.
 

SECTION
 
FBI files are organized into sections which usually contain about 200 pages of documents.
 

SECURITY FLASH
 
Procedure whereby field office asks HQ Identification Division if fingerprints of a Security Index subject have been received.
 

SECURITY INDEX

SECURITY INFORMANT
 
INDEX: List of persons who were subject to apprehension and detention during time of national emergency.  Previously called Custodial Detention List. At highest point, there were 26,000 names on the Security Index.

SECURITY INFORMANT:  See section 107G of FBI Manual of Instructions regarding procedures used by field offices with respect to handling their Security Informants.  HQ required field office Agents to contact their Security Informants every 2 weeks to obtain whatever information they had. Agents were required to prepare memo for their SAC to set forth "any personal weaknesses, domestic difficulties, indications of untrustworthiness or unreliability or other similar problems presented by the informant and the steps being taken by the Agent to prevent any such situations later becoming a source of embarrassment to the Bureau." [SAC Letter 55-13]

In 1960, the FBI had 433 live Security Informants inside the Communist Party.

For additional information see:

https://sites.google.com/site/ernie124102/cpusa/informants
 

SEE REF
 
Refers to index references to a subject which appear in files other than those created on that specific individual or organization.  Also known as xrefs or cross-references.  Typically, the FBI will not process “see refs” or cross-references when FOIA requests are made.  Instead, they only process “main files”.
 

SERIAL
 
Specific FBI document within a file.  Usually, serials are in chronological order.  Most serials are assigned specific numbers but there are also “unrecorded serials” which are not assigned a serial number but they usually appear in date sequence within a file.
 

SERIALIZE
 
To assign a specific serial number to a document in a file.
 

SGE
 
Security of Government Employees
 

SI
 
Security Informant
 

SI
 
Security Index Program [Began 06/40 as program to develop lists of individuals considered for detention in the event of a threat to the national security.  Individuals were added to SI based upon their membership and activity and/or association with subversive organizations considered dangerous or potentially dangerous to the internal security of the nation.  The Program required collection of sufficient information to justify apprehension and detention to minimize potential for espionage, sabotage, or subversion.  In its later years, the Index was broken down into three Priority groupings in accordance with the relative degree of dangerousness.  Priority I and II consisted of individuals in actual or potential leadership; Priority III was comprised of rank-and-file subjects. ]
 

SIO
 
Special Investigations Office
 

SIS
 
Special Intelligence Service (created during World War II for intelligence gathering primarily in Western Hemisphere countries.  Abolished in 1946.)
 

SM
 
Security Matter
 

SMC
 
Student Mobilization Committee To End The War In Vietnam
 

SODAC
 
Soviet Diplomatic Activities [HQ 65-30092]
 

SOG
 
Seat Of Government aka FBI HQ
 

SOI
 
Sources of Information
 

SOLO
 
Counterintelligence operation which developed high quality information about CPUSA, the Soviet Union and its satellites, and the world Communist movement largely based upon reports made by two high-level moles inside the CPUSA – Morris and Jack Childs – whose symbol numbers were CG-5184-S* and NY-694-S* respectively.
 

SOURCE
 
Source provides raw information on ad hoc basis but had no ongoing relationship with the FBI. Typically, a source could be a landlord or neighbor or employee of financial institution, employers, airline and hotel employees etc who provide information without a subpoena.  Also could be non-human (technical device).
 

SOVME
 
Soviet Messages Furnished To FBI By Bureau Sources [HQ 65-58068]
 

SPECTAR
 
Special Targets For Informant Development
 

SPECIAL CORRESPONDENTS LIST
 
Persons considered friendly toward Bureau interests who received Bureau publications and expedited replies to their inquiries.  Included politicians, news media employees, prominent business people, retired Special Agents, etc.
 

SPECIAL INQUIRY SECTION
 
FBI HQ unit that processed “name checks” for the White House
 

SPIA
 
Soviet Personnel Intelligence Assets
 

STOP NOTICE
 
FBI notice to an agency (such as Police Department or Immigration Service) to alert FBI if they had contact with specified individual.
 

SUB-FILE
 
A sub-section of a main file.  
 

SULET
 
Submit Letter
 

SUREP
 
Submit Report
 

SYMBOL NUMBER
 
Code used to disguise identity of FBI informants who provided “valuable and sensitive information on a regular basis.”  FBI Agents used symbol numbers in their investigative reports and memos without identifying the informant’s name.    Most symbol numbers consisted of three parts: 

(1) the 2-or-3 character prefix which identified the FBI field office to which the informant reported such as CG for Chicago or DL for Dallas or TP for Tampa or WFO for Washington field office.

(2) the specific number assigned to an informant and 

(3) the suffix which identified the type of informant – such as “C” for criminal and “S” for security and “R” for racial informant.

In addition, an asterisk added to a symbol number indicated that the informant should never be identified and was not available for court testimony.  One of the most important FBI informants was Morris Childs and his symbol number was CG-5824-S* which indicates that he was a Chicago security informant who should never be identified nor testify in court proceedings.
 

T-NUMBER
 
Temporary symbol number assigned to confidential information source mentioned in FBI report – such as T-1 or T-2.  A temporary symbol number applies only to the document in which it appears which means that the same confidential source could be assigned T-1 in one document and then be identified as T-7 in another document.  The specific identity of each T-source usually was provided on an Administrative Page attached to every FBI report.

Note:  A “T-number” can be assigned to a technique such as mail cover, trash cover, wiretap, or physical surveillance or even a burglary.  Illegal techniques were sometimes identified as “anonymous source” and then assigned a T-number.

In March 1955, FBI Director Hoover sent a memo to the Attorney General which made the following observations:

"In many instances, a source concealed by a temporary informant symbol is not a live informant, but, instead, is a technical surveillance, a microphone surveillance, a trash cover, mail cover, or other investigative technique...In an estimated 55% of the Security of Government Employee cases, the reports contain inanimate sources of this type whose identities are concealed by temporary informant symbols.  Other temporary informant symbols would pertain to such sources as live informants and neighbors or professional men who specifically requested their identities not be disclosed." [HQ 66-2542-3, serial #928, page 2; 3/1/55 Hoover memo to AG]
 

TELETYPE
 
Message transmitted by machine
 

TEPCI
 
Top Echelon Potential Criminal Informant
 

TESUR
 
Technical Surveillance (i.e. telephone wiretaps and microphone surveillance)
 

TF
 
Top Functionary
 

TGP
 
Theft of Government Property
 

THUMBNAIL SKETCH PROGRAM
 
Program initiated on 10/27/53 to insure that FBI field offices used current and uniform characterizations of subversive organizations in their reports.  About 425 organizations were summarized in Thumbnail Sketches.
 

TOPHAT
 
FBI code name for Lt. Gen. Dmitri Fedorovich Polyakov – a Soviet military intelligence official who was a double agent for the FBI for two decades. [HQ 105-18153]
 

TOPLEV
 
Top Level Intelligence (referring to key figures in criminal or subversive organizations)
 

TRASH COVER
 
FBI search for information by going through garbage
 

TROPUS
 
Travel of the President of the U.S.
 

TRUE COPY
 
FBI-typed copy of incoming handwritten letter
 

UACB
 
Unless Advised To The Contrary By Bureau
 

UCR
 
Uniform Crime Reports
 

UFAP
 
Unlawful Flight To Avoid Prosecution
 

UKA
 
United Klans of America, Inc. (led by Robert M. Shelton)
 

UN
 
Unknown
 

UNE
 
United Nations Employee
 

UNIRAC
 
Union Racketeering
 

UNRECORDED
 
A document in FBI file which was not given a serial number
 

UNSUB or UNSUBS
 
Unknown subject or subjects – i.e. the specific person(s) responsible for some criminal activity are not currently known 
 

UPRF
 
Unlawful Possession or Receipt of Firearms
 

USA
 
United States Attorney
 

USCIB
 
United States Communication Intelligence Board (pertains to decoding diplomatic intercepts)
 

USEB
 
United States Evaluation Board
 

UTL
 
Unable To Locate
 

VAUGHN INDEX
 
Court Ordered Listing Which Itemizes Every Document Withheld From FOIA Requester and Includes Justification For Each Claimed Exemption
 

VB
 
Venceremos Brigade
 

VEGMDN
 
FBI Case Re: Las Vegas Money Skimming
 

VIDEM
 
Vietnam Demonstrations
 

VRA-65
 
Voting Rights Act of 1965
 

VVAW
 
Vietnam Veterans Against The War
 

WAS
 
With Aliases – i.e. person is known to use different names
 

WFO
 
Washington field office of FBI
 

WKKKKOM
 
White Knights of the Ku Klux Klan of Mississippi (Samuel H. Bowers = Imperial Wizard)
 

WRL
 
War Resisters League
 

WSA
 
Worker Student Alliance
 

YIP
 
Youth International Party
 

YSA
 
Young Socialist Alliance
 





Section V = FBI STANDARD FORMS 


I don’t think anyone has ever compiled a comprehensive list of all standard forms used by the FBI – but I summarize below some of the ones I have come across:


FORM #
 
Subject Matter or Use
 

CC-320
 
Vocation Record [used to identify “specialized Bureau training and experience” including the specific training “schools” which Agents attended and specialized skills they had.]
 

DO-5
 
Director Office Record of Telephone Call or Visitor
 

DO-7
 
FBI Director Office Route Slip
 

FD-4
 
Field Office Internal Route Slip
 

FD-5
 
Serial Chargeout (document removed from one file and placed into another file)
 

FD-9
 
Request for FBI Identification Division to Furnish Criminal Record to Field Office
 

FD-36
 
Transmittal Instructions From Field Office [Instructions For Communications by Teletype or Airtel] in Plain Text or Code
 

FD-65
 
Fugitive Information
 

FD-71
 
Complaint Form (Public Contacts With FBI Field Offices – by phone, mail, or in-person)
 

FD-72
 
Report Form (For Field Office Report to HQ on Individual or Organization)
 

FD-73
 
Automobile Record Form
 

FD-115
 
Request to Post Office to Commence Mail Cover
 

FD-122
 
Field Office Recommendation For New Security Index or Reserve Index Card And Changes To Existing Cards

[SI Card identified person’s name, race, sex, date and place of birth, their residence and business addresses, whether native-born, naturalized, or alien and if they worked at a “Key Facility” that location was entered.  The security categories were: Communist, Socialist Workers Party, Independent Socialist League or Other (to be specified).  A “Tab For Detcom” option was included for apprehension and detention in time of national emergency.]
 

FD-128
 
Field Office Correction to Security Index Card
 

FD-142
 
Recommendation For Installation of Technical or Microphone Surveillance
 

FD-143
 
Justification For Continuation of Technical or Microphone Surveillance
 

FD-153
 
Interview Log
 

FD-154
 
Verification of Information on Security Index Card
 

FD-159
 
Record of Information Furnished Other Agencies
 

FD-160
 
Indices Search Slip – This form was sent to the Chief Clerk to request search of FBI indexes for criminal and/or subversive references on individuals or organizations or publications. A requester could ask to see a list of “all references” in FBI files or the search parameters could be limited to only “subversive references” or “criminal references” or specific case files (criminal or subversive).  The requester could also limit the search to specific years.
 

FD-165
 
Request That Security Flash Be Placed in Files Of Identification Division
 

FD-169
 
FBI File Information Furnished Orally to Another Agency
 

FD-186
 
Special Agent Personal Observation of Security Index Subject
 

FD-192
 
Inventory of Property Acquired As Evidence
 

FD-204
 
Cover Sheet to LHM [Usually contains “Synopsis” of information in the memo along with distribution of copies to other agencies (such as to Army Intelligence (G-2 or INTC=U.S. Army Intelligence Corps), Naval Intelligence (ONI, NISO, or NCIS), Air Force Intelligence (OSI),  U.S. Secret Service, INS, BATF, or other agencies.  The cover sheet normally reflects both the HQ and field office file numbers and name of Agent who prepared the report and the type of case being discussed.]
 

FD-205
 
Field Office Status Report [Form used by field office to tell HQ that deadline for submitting a report or for completing a case cannot be met and why.]
 

FD-209
 
Contacts With Security, Criminal, Racial Informants [Used to record contacts with informants and identify applicable file numbers and title/subject of case which information provided refers to]
 

FD-214
 
Suggested Bureau Indexing
 

FD-216
 
Summary of Information Received From Source
 

FD-221
 
Receipt for Money Received By Special Agent from SAC to Pay Source or Informant.  [Agent submits request to his SAC on FD-235]
 

FD-221A
 
Field Office SAC Request for Authorization To Pay Expenses Related To Informant
 

FD-221B
 
Receipt For Monies Paid For Services
 

FD-227
 
Field Office Request o HQ for Authorization of Mail Cover
 

FD-230
 
Certificate [Affirms individual not member of or affiliated with or associated with any organization on Attorney General’s List of Subversive Organizations]
 

FD-238
 
Security Informant Review Sheet [Checklist of items to be discussed with informant including background information required such as credit history, local criminal record, selective service status, armed services record, reliability, reputation. Informant also to be advised that he/she was not Bureau employee and their activities were voluntary, and informant should not retain copies of notes or reports and any payments made must be reported to IRS.]
 

FD-245
 
FBI File Cover Form [Form attached to front of each file section which lists the file number, the section number, and the serial numbers contained in that section.  Sometimes, it also lists other files which are pertinent to the case such as related files on individuals or the equivalent HQ file numbers.]
 

FD-245a
 
FBI File Cover Form For “Field Office Informant and Asset Files”
 

FD-249
 
Arrest Fingerprint Card
 

FD-256
 
Number 3 Card [Apparently intended for Agent use to list their anticipated activities for each day.]
 

FD-258
 
Applicant Fingerprint Card
 

FD-263
 
Cover Page of FBI Report [Usually contains “Synopsis” of information in the report along with distribution of copies (such as to other FBI offices, and/or to Army Intelligence (G-2 or INTC=U.S. Army Intelligence Corps), Naval Intelligence (ONI or NCIS), Air Force Intelligence (OSI),  U.S. Secret Service, INS, BATF, or other agencies.]
 

FD-266
 
Field Office Request for Information on Person From Another Field Office
 

FD-272
 
Cover Page for Report Being Sent Outside FBI [Form shows title of case, character of case, Agent who wrote the report, the investigative time period, the office of origin, and distribution of report and the identity of informants used for information contained in the report.  This cover page would be attached to FD-204 and probably was detached before mailing.]
 

FD-302
 
Interview Report in Security Type Investigations (Reports by Special Agents)
 

FD-305
 
Summary of Background Information and Subversive Activity on Person
 

FD-306
 
Cover Sheet For Informant Report or Material
 

FD-315
 
FBI Request to Immigration and Naturalization Service
 

FD-338
 
Authorization For Destruction of Individual Serials
 

FD-340A
 
Envelope [Envelope placed in front or back of files for storing evidence that may be needed in court proceedings such as photographs, surveillance logs, signed statements, etc.]
 

FD-341
 
Radio Equipment Maintenance Log
 

FD-348
 
Source Information Card
 

FD-350
 
Form for Mounting Newspaper Clippings
 

FD-353
 
Fingerprint Card
 

FD-365
 
Transmittal Form From SAC of Field Office to HQ
 

FD-366
 
Change of Address on Subject of Investigation
 

 
FD-376
 
Information Sent to Secret Service {Can be on potentially dangerous person “because of background, emotional instability, or activity in groups engaged in activities inimical to U.S.” or because of “threats or actions against persons protected by Secret Service” or person who made “threatening or abusive statement about U.S. or foreign official” or person who has participated “in civil disturbances, anti U.S. demonstrations or hostile incidents against foreign diplomatic establishments” or person who has “expressed strong anti-U.S. sentiments“ or “antipathy toward good order and government” or person engaged in “illegal bombing, bomb-making, or other terrorist activity”]
 

FD-397
 
Adding/Removing Subject to Rabble Rouser or Agitator Index
 

FD-401
 
Informant Progress/Justification Letter
 

FD-405
 
Status Report, Racial Informants, Extremist Groups (White-Black)—Racial Matters
 

FD-411
 
Selective Service – Case Closed Form
 

FD-503
 
Inventory Worksheet – For Court Ordered List of Documents
 

FD-553
 
US Army to FBI re: AWOL’s
 

FD-610
 
Route Slip From SAC of Field Office to Civil Rights Unit of Criminal Investigative Division
 

ND-5
 
National Defense Division Route Slip (1940)
 

ND-32
 
Security Division Route Slip (1942)
 

10 or 64
 
U.S. Government Memo
 

O-1
 
HQ Request That Field Office Submit Report or Explain Why Not Submitted; Status Report
 

O-7
 
Routing Slip To Field or Legat Offices
 

O-9
 
HQ Criticism of Field Office Handling of Case
 

O-17
 
HQ To Field Office re: Communication Containing an Error
 

O-25
 
Route Slip
 

O-73
 
Message Relay Form from Director to SAC’s and to Outside Agencies
 

2-11
 
In-Service Course [Form used to specify what type of courses an Agent was scheduled to attend – such as Security, Criminal or General]
 

3-43
 
Administrative Division Route Slip – Personnel Section
 

3-46
 
Administrative Division Route Slip -- Internal
 

4-11
 
Records and Communication Division Route Slip
 

4-22

4-22A
 
FBI Records Section – Search Form [Identifies files/serials identified as potentially responsive to search instructions and the type of search requested -- such as “all references” or just “subversive” or “criminal” or “non-subversive” or “main file” references.  Search instructions can be restricted to specific locality or to an exact name – or instructions can be more expansive such as requesting search for all name variations.]
 

4-76
 
Crime Records Section Route Slip
 

4-257
 
Authorization For Sending File to “Special Files Room” aka JUNE Mail
 

4-312
 
Incoming JUNE Mail and Date When Sent to Special Files Room in Records Branch
 

4-413
 
Serial Chargeout
 

4-528
 
Serial “Changed To”  form – for serial moved to another file
 

4-750
 
FOIPA Deleted Page Information Sheet
 

5-1
 
Central Research Section – Subscription Status [Used to communicate with field office regarding what publications and/or subscriptions HQ wanted field offices to obtain.  HQ memos usually were captioned “Publications—Handling of By Research-Satellite Section”
 (or Central Research Section) and data was provided re: routing and distribution.
 

5-6
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – Internal Security Section – Route Slip
 

5-7
 
Domestic Intelligence Division Route Slip = Internal
 

5-9
 
Domestic Intelligence Division Route Slip – External
 

5-10
 
Domestic Intelligence Division - Research—Satellite Section - Route Slip
 

5-78
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – Subversive Control Section – Route Slip (later known as Extremist Intelligence Section)
 

5-103
 
Central Research Section Book Review Request Form
 

5-113
 
Domestic Intelligence Division – “Informative Note”
 

6-48
 
Fraud, Selective Service and Civil Section Route Slip
 

7-1B
 
Report of FBI Laboratory
 

8-3
 
Crime Records Division Route Slip
 

8-115
 
Correspondence and Tours Section Route Slip
 

17-1
 
FOIPA Form – Prior To National Security Classification Review
 

 


Section VI = FBI OFFICE CODES 


FBI OFFICE CODES:

 Most FBI field offices were identified by their two-character abbreviations. [One exception is Washington field which was WFO.] A complete list appears here:

http://www.historyofphonephreaking.org/writings/htraff/fbi-office-abbreviations.php 

Foreign offices (Legal Attaches) were identified by three-character abbreviations – such as MEX for Mexico City, Mexico or OTT for Ottawa, Canada.

 FBI CODED MESSAGES TO OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCIES


CODE
 
Agency / Recipient
 

RUEBWJA
 
ATTORNEY GENERAL / DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL / ASST ATTORNEY GENERAL – CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION

ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL – CRIMINAL DIVISION OR INTERNAL SECURITY SECTION

U.S. MARSHAL’S SERVICE / INS 
 

RUEBJGA
 
COMMANDANT, U.S. COAST GUARD
 

RUEBDUA
 
DEPARTMENT OF THE AIR FORCE
 

RUEASCI
 
DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY
 

RUEBJGA
 
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
 

RUEAIIA
 
DIRECTOR, CIA
 

RUEKJCS
 
DIRECTOR, DEFENSE INTELLIGENCE AGENCY
 

RUEABND
 
DRUG ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION
 

RHEGGTN
 
ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEOGBA
 
FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEANAT
 
NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION
 

RUEOIAA
 
NATIONAL SECURITY AGENCY
 

RUEOLKN
 
NAVAL INVESTIGATIVE SERVICE
 

RUEADWW
 
THE PRESIDENT / VICE PRESIDENT / WHITE HOUSE SITUATION ROOM
 

RUEAUSA
 
U.S. POSTAL SERVICE (IF CLASSIFIED)
 

RUEVDFS
 
U.S. POSTAL SERVICE (IF UNCLASSIFIED)
 

RUEHSE
 
U.S. SECRET SERVICE
 

RUEHOC
 
U.S. SECRETARY OF STATE
 
 





 



























 







Sign in|Recent Site Activity|Report Abuse|Print Page|Powered By Google Sites


              

 





















You do not have permission to add comments.


 







Sign in|Recent Site Activity|Report Abuse|Print Page|Powered By Google Sites


              

 
